Ich bin.;I am.
Die Forscherin analysierte die umfangreichen Daten sorgfältig, wobei sämtliche statistischen Abweichungen detailliert dokumentiert wurden.;The researcher analyzed the extensive data carefully, whereby all statistical deviations were documented in detail.
Vorausgesetzt, dass alle Genehmigungen rechtzeitig erteilt werden, kann das interdisziplinäre Projekt planmäßig abgeschlossen werden.;Provided that all approvals are granted on time, the interdisciplinary project can be completed as planned.
Es sei denn, dass unvorhergesehene technische Probleme auftreten, wird die Implementierung der Software erfolgreich verlaufen.;Unless unforeseen technical problems occur, the software implementation will proceed successfully.
Die Präsentation, deren komplexe Analysen sämtliche relevanten Variablen berücksichtigte, überzeugte die Fachjury.;The presentation, whose complex analyses took all relevant variables into account, convinced the expert panel.
Indem die Abteilung die Arbeitsabläufe optimierte, konnte die Produktivität signifikant gesteigert werden.;By optimizing the workflows, the department was able to significantly increase productivity.
Die Ergebnisse, die im Rahmen der Studie erhoben worden waren, dienen als Grundlage für zukünftige Entscheidungen.;The results, which had been collected within the framework of the study, serve as the basis for future decisions.
Zumal die internationalen Märkte volatil geblieben waren, entschied sich das Management für konservative Investitionsstrategien.;Especially since the international markets had remained volatile, management decided on conservative investment strategies.
Nichtsdestotrotz gelang es der Forschungsgruppe, die anspruchsvollen Experimente erfolgreich durchzuführen.;Nevertheless, the research group managed to carry out the demanding experiments successfully.
Die Abteilung nutzte funktionale Verbphrasen wie „in Betracht ziehen“ und „zur Verfügung stellen“, um komplexe Prozesse präzise zu beschreiben.;The department used functional verb phrases such as “consider” and “provide” to describe complex processes precisely.
Gesetzt den Fall, dass alle Messdaten korrekt ausgewertet worden sind, können die Forschungsergebnisse veröffentlicht werden.;Assuming that all measurement data have been correctly evaluated, the research results can be published.
Die Wissenschaftlerin berichtete in indirekter Rede, dass die Hypothesen durch die aktuellen Ergebnisse bestätigt worden seien.;The scientist reported in indirect speech that the hypotheses had been confirmed by the current results.
Indessen wurde deutlich, dass die geplanten Maßnahmen noch weiterer Anpassungen bedurften.;Meanwhile, it became clear that the planned measures still required further adjustments.
Die komplexen Partizipialattribute, die in der Präsentation verwendet wurden, ermöglichten eine präzise Darstellung der Ergebnisse.;The complex participial attributes used in the presentation enabled a precise representation of the results.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Erfahrungen entschied sich das Team, die Strategie vorsichtiger zu gestalten.;Mindful of previous experiences, the team decided to make the strategy more cautious.
Die wissenschaftliche Arbeit, die zahlreiche Nominalisierungen aufweist, stellt für die Fachcommunity eine wertvolle Ressource dar.;The scientific paper, which contains numerous nominalizations, represents a valuable resource for the professional community.
Insofern als die Ergebnisse valide sind, können sie als Grundlage für weiterführende Forschungen dienen.;Insofar as the results are valid, they can serve as the basis for further research.
Nichtsdestoweniger konnte die Abteilung die komplexen Analysen termingerecht abschließen.;Nonetheless, the department was able to complete the complex analyses on schedule.
Die Untersuchung zeigte, wobei sämtliche relevanten Faktoren berücksichtigt wurden, signifikante Zusammenhänge zwischen den Variablen.;The study showed, whereby all relevant factors were considered, significant correlations between the variables.
Die Forscher nutzten anticipatory-es-Konstruktionen, um die Hypothesen prägnant einzuleiten.;The researchers used anticipatory “es” constructions to introduce the hypotheses concisely.
Die Ergebnisse, deren Validität umfassend geprüft worden war, bilden die Grundlage für die anschließende Publikation.;The results, whose validity had been thoroughly examined, form the basis for the subsequent publication.
Die Komplexität der Studie erforderte eine detaillierte Berücksichtigung sämtlicher Einflussfaktoren, wodurch die Analysen besonders präzise wurden.;The complexity of the study required a detailed consideration of all influencing factors, making the analyses particularly precise.
Vorausgesetzt, dass die Methoden korrekt angewendet wurden, lassen sich die Schlussfolgerungen zuverlässig ableiten.;Provided that the methods were applied correctly, the conclusions can be reliably derived.
Die Forscherin stellte klar, dass die Ergebnisse unter Berücksichtigung aller Messungen interpretiert werden müssten.;The researcher clarified that the results must be interpreted taking all measurements into account.
Zumal die Datensätze umfangreich und heterogen waren, wurde eine sorgfältige Datenaufbereitung notwendig.;Especially since the datasets were extensive and heterogeneous, careful data preparation became necessary.
Die wissenschaftliche Publikation, deren Argumentation auf fundierten empirischen Daten basiert, überzeugt durch hohe Qualität.;The scientific publication, whose argumentation is based on well-founded empirical data, impresses with high quality.
Nichtsdestotrotz traten unerwartete Abweichungen auf, die eine erneute Überprüfung der Hypothesen erforderten.;Nevertheless, unexpected deviations occurred that required a re-examination of the hypotheses.
Die Abteilung erstellte komplexe nominalisierte Strukturen, die die theoretischen Konzepte präzise zusammenfassten.;The department created complex nominalized structures that precisely summarized the theoretical concepts.
Indem die Forscher verschiedene methodische Ansätze kombinierten, konnte die Validität der Ergebnisse erhöht werden.;By combining various methodological approaches, the researchers were able to increase the validity of the results.
Die Analyse zeigte, wobei sämtliche Variablen berücksichtigt wurden, dass signifikante Korrelationen zwischen den Faktoren bestehen.;The analysis showed, taking all variables into account, that significant correlations exist between the factors.
Die Wissenschaftler berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass die Experimente planmäßig durchgeführt worden seien.;The scientists reported in the subjunctive I that the experiments had been carried out as planned.
Die Studie verdeutlichte, dass eine systematische Berücksichtigung aller Einflussgrößen für valide Ergebnisse unabdingbar ist.;The study demonstrated that a systematic consideration of all influencing factors is indispensable for valid results.
Es sei denn, dass neue Daten vorliegen, wird die bisherige Hypothese weiterhin als gültig betrachtet.;Unless new data are available, the previous hypothesis will continue to be considered valid.
Die Forscher nutzten komplexe Partizipialattribute, um die Zusammenhänge zwischen den Variablen klar und präzise darzustellen.;The researchers used complex participial attributes to present the relationships between the variables clearly and precisely.
Die Abteilung antizipierte mögliche Probleme, wobei sämtliche Eventualitäten sorgfältig geprüft wurden.;The department anticipated possible problems, whereby all eventualities were carefully examined.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Ergebnisse entschied sich das Team für eine vorsichtige Anpassung der Methodik.;Mindful of the previous results, the team decided on a cautious adjustment of the methodology.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren theoretische Grundlage besonders umfangreich ist, dient als Referenz für zukünftige Arbeiten.;The publication, whose theoretical foundation is particularly extensive, serves as a reference for future work.
Indem die Forscher die Daten mehrfach überprüften, konnte die Aussagekraft der Ergebnisse erhöht werden.;By checking the data multiple times, the researchers were able to increase the significance of the results.
Die Ergebnisse, die unter Berücksichtigung aller Einflussfaktoren analysiert wurden, lieferten wertvolle Erkenntnisse.;The results, which were analyzed taking all influencing factors into account, provided valuable insights.
Nichtsdestoweniger war eine kritische Reflexion der Methodik notwendig, um die Forschungsergebnisse zu validieren.;Nonetheless, a critical reflection on the methodology was necessary to validate the research results.
Gesetzt den Fall, dass alle Messungen korrekt durchgeführt worden sind, können die Hypothesen belastbar überprüft werden.;Assuming that all measurements have been carried out correctly, the hypotheses can be reliably tested.
Die Abteilung überprüfte sämtliche Forschungsdaten erneut, wobei die methodischen Abweichungen detailliert dokumentiert wurden.;The department reviewed all research data again, whereby the methodological deviations were documented in detail.
Insofern als die bisherigen Ergebnisse valide sind, können sie als Grundlage für die weiterführende Analyse dienen.;Insofar as the previous results are valid, they can serve as the basis for further analysis.
Die Forscherin stellte klar, dass sämtliche Messungen unter identischen Bedingungen hätten durchgeführt werden müssen.;The researcher clarified that all measurements should have been conducted under identical conditions.
Eingedenk der umfangreichen Vorarbeiten entschied sich das Team, die Methodik vorsichtig zu modifizieren.;Mindful of the extensive preliminary work, the team decided to modify the methodology cautiously.
Die wissenschaftliche Veröffentlichung, deren theoretische Fundierung besonders überzeugend ist, wurde von internationalen Fachleuten hoch gelobt.;The scientific publication, whose theoretical foundation is particularly convincing, was highly praised by international experts.
Nichtsdestotrotz traten unerwartete Abweichungen auf, die eine erneute Analyse der Datensätze erforderlich machten.;Nevertheless, unexpected deviations occurred, which made a re-analysis of the datasets necessary.
Indem die Forscher komplexe nominalisierte Strukturen verwendeten, konnten sie die theoretischen Konzepte präzise darstellen.;By using complex nominalized structures, the researchers were able to represent the theoretical concepts precisely.
Die Analyse zeigte, wobei sämtliche Einflussfaktoren berücksichtigt wurden, dass signifikante Korrelationen zwischen den Variablen bestehen.;The analysis showed, taking all influencing factors into account, that significant correlations exist between the variables.
Die Wissenschaftler berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass die Experimente erfolgreich abgeschlossen worden seien.;The scientists reported in the subjunctive I that the experiments had been successfully completed.
Zumal die Datensätze heterogen und umfangreich waren, erforderte die statistische Auswertung besondere Sorgfalt.;Especially since the datasets were heterogeneous and extensive, the statistical evaluation required special care.
Die Abteilung antizipierte mögliche Risiken, wobei sämtliche Eventualitäten umfassend geprüft wurden.;The department anticipated possible risks, whereby all eventualities were comprehensively examined.
Vorausgesetzt, dass alle Analysen korrekt durchgeführt worden sind, lassen sich belastbare Schlussfolgerungen ziehen.;Provided that all analyses have been conducted correctly, reliable conclusions can be drawn.
Die Forscherin betonte, dass die Hypothesen nur unter Berücksichtigung aller relevanten Variablen überprüft werden dürften.;The researcher emphasized that the hypotheses should only be tested taking all relevant variables into account.
Die Untersuchung verdeutlichte, dass eine systematische Berücksichtigung sämtlicher Einflussgrößen unabdingbar für valide Ergebnisse ist.;The study demonstrated that a systematic consideration of all influencing factors is indispensable for valid results.
Nichtsdestoweniger konnten die Teams trotz erheblicher Komplexität die Experimente termingerecht abschließen.;Nonetheless, the teams were able to complete the experiments on time despite considerable complexity.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren Argumentationsstruktur besonders komplex ist, stellt eine wertvolle Ressource für die Fachcommunity dar.;The publication, whose argumentation structure is particularly complex, represents a valuable resource for the professional community.
Indem die Abteilung methodische Standards einführte, wurde die Vergleichbarkeit der Ergebnisse deutlich erhöht.;By introducing methodological standards, the department significantly increased the comparability of the results.
Die Ergebnisse, die unter Berücksichtigung sämtlicher Einflussfaktoren analysiert wurden, lieferten neue Erkenntnisse für die Forschung.;The results, which were analyzed taking all influencing factors into account, provided new insights for research.
Es sei denn, dass neue Daten verfügbar werden, bleibt die bisherige Hypothese weiterhin gültig.;Unless new data become available, the previous hypothesis remains valid.
Gesetzt den Fall, dass alle Messungen korrekt ausgewertet worden sind, können die theoretischen Annahmen zuverlässig überprüft werden.;Assuming that all measurements have been evaluated correctly, the theoretical assumptions can be reliably tested.
Die Forscher nutzten komplexe Partizipialattribute, um die kausalen Zusammenhänge zwischen den Variablen präzise darzustellen.;The researchers used complex participial attributes to represent the causal relationships between the variables precisely.
Indessen wurde deutlich, dass die implementierten Maßnahmen noch weiterer Optimierungen bedurften.;Meanwhile, it became clear that the implemented measures still required further optimizations.
Die Abteilung analysierte sämtliche Rückmeldungen, wobei die qualitativen und quantitativen Ergebnisse getrennt ausgewertet wurden.;The department analyzed all feedback, whereby the qualitative and quantitative results were evaluated separately.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Forschungsergebnisse entschied sich das Team, die Methodik vorsichtig zu adaptieren.;Mindful of the previous research results, the team decided to adapt the methodology cautiously.
Die wissenschaftliche Studie, die zahlreiche Nominalisierungen und Partizipialattribute einsetzt, liefert eine präzise Beschreibung der komplexen Prozesse.;The scientific study, which uses numerous nominalizations and participial attributes, provides a precise description of the complex processes.
Nichtsdestotrotz mussten unerwartete Abweichungen berücksichtigt werden, um valide Ergebnisse zu gewährleisten.;Nevertheless, unexpected deviations had to be considered to ensure valid results.
Die Analyse, deren Datenbasis besonders umfangreich war, zeigte signifikante Zusammenhänge zwischen den untersuchten Variablen.;The analysis, whose dataset was particularly extensive, showed significant correlations between the examined variables.
Indem die Forscher verschiedene statistische Modelle kombinierten, konnte die Aussagekraft der Ergebnisse erhöht werden.;By combining various statistical models, the researchers were able to increase the significance of the results.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren theoretische Fundierung und methodische Präzision überzeugte, wurde in internationalen Fachjournalen veröffentlicht.;The publication, whose theoretical foundation and methodological precision were convincing, was published in international journals.
Die Forscher berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass sämtliche Experimente gemäß den vorgeschriebenen Standards durchgeführt worden seien.;The researchers reported in the subjunctive I that all experiments had been conducted according to the prescribed standards.
Die Abteilung nutzte funktionale Verbphrasen wie „in Betracht ziehen“ und „zur Verfügung stellen“, um komplexe Abläufe verständlich zu erklären.;The department used functional verb phrases such as “consider” and “provide” to explain complex processes understandably.
Die Ergebnisse, deren Validität umfassend überprüft worden war, dienen als Grundlage für die weitere Forschung.;The results, whose validity had been thoroughly checked, serve as the basis for further research.
Zumal die Datensätze heterogen waren, erforderte die statistische Auswertung eine besondere methodische Präzision.;Especially since the datasets were heterogeneous, the statistical evaluation required special methodological precision.
Die Forscherin stellte klar, dass sämtliche Hypothesen nur unter Berücksichtigung aller Einflussfaktoren überprüft werden dürften.;The researcher clarified that all hypotheses should only be tested taking all influencing factors into account.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Experimente entschied sich das Team, die Versuchsreihen vorsichtig zu modifizieren.;Mindful of the previous experiments, the team decided to modify the test series cautiously.
Die Analyse, die sämtliche Variablen berücksichtigte, lieferte belastbare Ergebnisse für die anschließende Publikation.;The analysis, which considered all variables, provided reliable results for the subsequent publication.
Nichtsdestoweniger mussten zusätzliche Messungen durchgeführt werden, um die Validität der Ergebnisse abzusichern.;Nonetheless, additional measurements had to be carried out to secure the validity of the results.
Die Forscher nutzten anticipatory-es-Konstruktionen, um die zentralen Thesen der Untersuchung präzise einzuleiten.;The researchers used anticipatory “es” constructions to introduce the central theses of the study precisely.
Indem die Abteilung standardisierte Verfahren implementierte, konnte die Vergleichbarkeit der Ergebnisse signifikant verbessert werden.;By implementing standardized procedures, the department was able to significantly improve the comparability of the results.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren Argumentationslogik besonders stringent war, gilt als wegweisend für zukünftige Arbeiten.;The publication, whose argumentative logic was particularly stringent, is considered groundbreaking for future work.
Die Abteilung analysierte die umfangreichen Daten, wobei sämtliche methodischen Fehler akribisch dokumentiert wurden.;The department analyzed the extensive data, whereby all methodological errors were meticulously documented.
Vorausgesetzt, dass sämtliche Messungen ordnungsgemäß durchgeführt worden sind, können die theoretischen Annahmen belastbar überprüft werden.;Provided that all measurements have been carried out correctly, the theoretical assumptions can be reliably tested.
Die Forscherin stellte klar, dass die Hypothesen nur unter Berücksichtigung sämtlicher relevanter Variablen überprüft werden dürften.;The researcher clarified that the hypotheses should only be tested taking all relevant variables into account.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Ergebnisse entschied sich das Team, die Methodik vorsichtig anzupassen, um valide Ergebnisse zu gewährleisten.;Mindful of the previous results, the team decided to adjust the methodology cautiously to ensure valid results.
Die wissenschaftliche Veröffentlichung, deren Argumentationsstruktur besonders komplex ist, dient als Referenz für die internationale Fachcommunity.;The scientific publication, whose argumentative structure is particularly complex, serves as a reference for the international professional community.
Nichtsdestoweniger traten unerwartete Abweichungen auf, die eine erneute Analyse der Datensätze erforderlich machten.;Nonetheless, unexpected deviations occurred, which made a re-analysis of the datasets necessary.
Indem die Forscher komplexe nominalisierte Strukturen verwendeten, konnten sie die theoretischen Konzepte präzise darstellen.;By using complex nominalized structures, the researchers were able to represent the theoretical concepts precisely.
Die Analyse zeigte, wobei sämtliche Einflussfaktoren berücksichtigt wurden, dass signifikante Korrelationen zwischen den Variablen bestehen.;The analysis showed, taking all influencing factors into account, that significant correlations exist between the variables.
Die Wissenschaftler berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass die Experimente erfolgreich abgeschlossen worden seien.;The scientists reported in the subjunctive I that the experiments had been successfully completed.
Zumal die Datensätze heterogen und umfangreich waren, erforderte die statistische Auswertung besondere Sorgfalt.;Especially since the datasets were heterogeneous and extensive, the statistical evaluation required special care.
Indessen wurde deutlich, dass die implementierten Maßnahmen noch weiterer Optimierungen bedurften.;Meanwhile, it became clear that the implemented measures still required further optimizations.
Die Abteilung analysierte sämtliche Rückmeldungen, wobei die qualitativen und quantitativen Ergebnisse getrennt ausgewertet wurden.;The department analyzed all feedback, whereby the qualitative and quantitative results were evaluated separately.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Forschungsergebnisse entschied sich das Team, die Methodik vorsichtig zu adaptieren.;Mindful of the previous research results, the team decided to adapt the methodology cautiously.
Die wissenschaftliche Studie, die zahlreiche Nominalisierungen und Partizipialattribute einsetzt, liefert eine präzise Beschreibung der komplexen Prozesse.;The scientific study, which uses numerous nominalizations and participial attributes, provides a precise description of the complex processes.
Nichtsdestotrotz mussten unerwartete Abweichungen berücksichtigt werden, um valide Ergebnisse zu gewährleisten.;Nevertheless, unexpected deviations had to be considered to ensure valid results.
Die Analyse, deren Datenbasis besonders umfangreich war, zeigte signifikante Zusammenhänge zwischen den untersuchten Variablen.;The analysis, whose dataset was particularly extensive, showed significant correlations between the examined variables.
Indem die Forscher verschiedene statistische Modelle kombinierten, konnte die Aussagekraft der Ergebnisse erhöht werden.;By combining various statistical models, the researchers were able to increase the significance of the results.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren theoretische Fundierung und methodische Präzision überzeugte, wurde in internationalen Fachjournalen veröffentlicht.;The publication, whose theoretical foundation and methodological precision were convincing, was published in international journals.
Die Forscher berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass sämtliche Experimente gemäß den vorgeschriebenen Standards durchgeführt worden seien.;The researchers reported in the subjunctive I that all experiments had been conducted according to the prescribed standards.
Die Abteilung nutzte funktionale Verbphrasen wie „in Betracht ziehen“ und „zur Verfügung stellen“, um komplexe Abläufe verständlich zu erklären.;The department used functional verb phrases such as “consider” and “provide” to explain complex processes understandably.
Die Ergebnisse, deren Validität umfassend überprüft worden war, dienen als Grundlage für die weitere Forschung.;The results, whose validity had been thoroughly checked, serve as the basis for further research.
Zumal die Datensätze heterogen waren, erforderte die statistische Auswertung eine besondere methodische Präzision.;Especially since the datasets were heterogeneous, the statistical evaluation required special methodological precision.
Die Forscherin stellte klar, dass sämtliche Hypothesen nur unter Berücksichtigung aller Einflussfaktoren überprüft werden dürften.;The researcher clarified that all hypotheses should only be tested taking all influencing factors into account.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Experimente entschied sich das Team, die Versuchsreihen vorsichtig zu modifizieren.;Mindful of the previous experiments, the team decided to modify the test series cautiously.
Die Analyse, die sämtliche Variablen berücksichtigte, lieferte belastbare Ergebnisse für die anschließende Publikation.;The analysis, which considered all variables, provided reliable results for the subsequent publication.
Nichtsdestoweniger mussten zusätzliche Messungen durchgeführt werden, um die Validität der Ergebnisse abzusichern.;Nonetheless, additional measurements had to be carried out to secure the validity of the results.
Die Forscher nutzten anticipatory-es-Konstruktionen, um die zentralen Thesen der Untersuchung präzise einzuleiten.;The researchers used anticipatory “es” constructions to introduce the central theses of the study precisely.
Indem die Abteilung standardisierte Verfahren implementierte, konnte die Vergleichbarkeit der Ergebnisse signifikant verbessert werden.;By implementing standardized procedures, the department was able to significantly improve the comparability of the results.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren Argumentationslogik besonders stringent war, gilt als wegweisend für zukünftige Arbeiten.;The publication, whose argumentative logic was particularly stringent, is considered groundbreaking for future work.
Die Untersuchung zeigte, wobei alle relevanten Variablen berücksichtigt wurden, dass kausale Zusammenhänge zwischen den Faktoren bestehen.;The study showed, taking all relevant variables into account, that causal relationships exist between the factors.
Die Forscher analysierten die Ergebnisse, sodass sich neue Hypothesen für weiterführende Studien ableiten ließen.;The researchers analyzed the results so that new hypotheses could be derived for further studies.
Vorausgesetzt, dass die Messinstrumente kalibriert wurden, lassen sich die Daten zuverlässig interpretieren.;Provided that the measuring instruments were calibrated, the data can be interpreted reliably.
Die Abteilung dokumentierte sämtliche Prozesse, wobei alle methodischen Abweichungen detailliert erfasst wurden.;The department documented all processes, whereby all methodological deviations were recorded in detail.
Die Studie verdeutlichte, dass nur eine systematische Berücksichtigung aller Einflussgrößen valide Ergebnisse gewährleisten kann.;The study demonstrated that only a systematic consideration of all influencing factors can ensure valid results.
Nichtsdestotrotz war eine kritische Reflexion der angewendeten Methodik notwendig, um die Ergebnisse zu validieren.;Nevertheless, a critical reflection of the applied methodology was necessary to validate the results.
Die Forscherin erläuterte, dass sämtliche Hypothesen unter Berücksichtigung der experimentellen Rahmenbedingungen überprüft werden müssten.;The researcher explained that all hypotheses must be tested taking the experimental conditions into account.
Die Analyse zeigte, wobei sämtliche Variablen berücksichtigt wurden, signifikante Korrelationen zwischen den untersuchten Parametern.;The analysis showed, taking all variables into account, significant correlations between the examined parameters.
Indem die Abteilung die Arbeitsabläufe standardisierte, konnte die Effizienz der Untersuchung deutlich gesteigert werden.;By standardizing the workflows, the department was able to significantly increase the efficiency of the investigation.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren theoretische Fundierung besonders überzeugend war, gilt als Referenz für künftige Forschungen.;The publication, whose theoretical foundation was particularly convincing, serves as a reference for future research.
Die Forscher berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass sämtliche Experimente nach den vorgeschriebenen Standards durchgeführt worden seien.;The researchers reported in the subjunctive I that all experiments had been conducted according to the prescribed standards.
Die Abteilung überprüfte die umfangreichen Forschungsdaten, wobei sämtliche Abweichungen präzise dokumentiert und für die anschließende Analyse aufbereitet wurden.;The department reviewed the extensive research data, whereby all deviations were precisely documented and prepared for the subsequent analysis.
Vorausgesetzt, dass die Methodik korrekt angewendet worden ist, lassen sich belastbare Rückschlüsse für weiterführende Studien ziehen.;Provided that the methodology has been applied correctly, reliable conclusions can be drawn for further studies.
Die Forscherin stellte klar, dass sämtliche Hypothesen nur unter Berücksichtigung aller relevanten Variablen überprüft werden dürften.;The researcher clarified that the hypotheses should only be tested taking all relevant variables into account.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Forschungsergebnisse entschied sich das Team, die Versuchsanordnungen vorsichtig zu modifizieren, um valide Ergebnisse zu gewährleisten.;Mindful of the previous research results, the team decided to cautiously modify the experimental setups to ensure valid results.
Die wissenschaftliche Veröffentlichung, deren Argumentationsstruktur besonders stringent war, diente als Referenz für die internationale Fachcommunity.;The scientific publication, whose argumentative structure was particularly stringent, served as a reference for the international professional community.
Nichtsdestoweniger traten unerwartete Abweichungen auf, die eine erneute statistische Auswertung der Daten erforderten.;Nonetheless, unexpected deviations occurred, which required a re-analysis of the statistical data.
Indem die Forscher komplexe nominalisierte Strukturen verwendeten, konnten sie die theoretischen Konzepte präzise und nachvollziehbar darstellen.;By using complex nominalized structures, the researchers were able to represent the theoretical concepts precisely and comprehensibly.
Die Analyse zeigte, wobei sämtliche Einflussfaktoren berücksichtigt wurden, dass signifikante Korrelationen zwischen den untersuchten Variablen bestehen.;The analysis showed, taking all influencing factors into account, that significant correlations exist between the examined variables.
Die Wissenschaftler berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass die Experimente planmäßig und erfolgreich abgeschlossen worden seien.;The scientists reported in the subjunctive I that the experiments had been completed according to plan and successfully.
Zumal die Datensätze umfangreich und heterogen waren, erforderte die Auswertung eine besonders sorgfältige methodische Vorgehensweise.;Especially since the datasets were extensive and heterogeneous, the evaluation required a particularly careful methodological approach.
Indessen wurde deutlich, dass die implementierten Maßnahmen noch weiterer Anpassungen bedurften, um die Ergebnisse valide zu gestalten.;Meanwhile, it became clear that the implemented measures still required further adjustments to make the results valid.
Die Abteilung analysierte sämtliche Rückmeldungen, wobei qualitative und quantitative Ergebnisse getrennt ausgewertet wurden, um präzise Schlussfolgerungen zu ermöglichen.;The department analyzed all feedback, whereby qualitative and quantitative results were evaluated separately to allow precise conclusions.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Forschungsergebnisse entschied sich das Team, die Methodik vorsichtig zu adaptieren und zusätzliche Kontrollvariablen einzubeziehen.;Mindful of the previous research results, the team decided to adapt the methodology cautiously and include additional control variables.
Die wissenschaftliche Studie, die zahlreiche Partizipialattribute und Nominalisierungen einsetzt, liefert eine detaillierte Beschreibung der komplexen Prozesse.;The scientific study, which uses numerous participial attributes and nominalizations, provides a detailed description of the complex processes.
Nichtsdestotrotz mussten unerwartete Abweichungen berücksichtigt werden, um die Validität der Ergebnisse sicherzustellen.;Nevertheless, unexpected deviations had to be considered to ensure the validity of the results.
Die Analyse, deren Datenbasis besonders umfangreich war, zeigte signifikante Zusammenhänge zwischen den untersuchten Variablen und ermöglichte belastbare Schlussfolgerungen.;The analysis, whose dataset was particularly extensive, showed significant correlations between the examined variables and allowed reliable conclusions.
Indem die Forscher verschiedene statistische Modelle kombinierten, konnte die Aussagekraft der Ergebnisse deutlich erhöht werden.;By combining various statistical models, the researchers were able to significantly increase the significance of the results.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren theoretische Fundierung und methodische Präzision überzeugte, wurde in internationalen Fachzeitschriften publiziert.;The publication, whose theoretical foundation and methodological precision were convincing, was published in international journals.
Die Forscher berichteten im Konjunktiv I, dass sämtliche Experimente gemäß den vorgeschriebenen Standards durchgeführt worden seien und die Ergebnisse valide seien.;The researchers reported in the subjunctive I that all experiments had been conducted according to the prescribed standards and that the results were valid.
Die Abteilung nutzte funktionale Verbphrasen wie „in Betracht ziehen“ und „zur Verfügung stellen“, um komplexe Prozesse verständlich und nachvollziehbar zu erläutern.;The department used functional verb phrases such as “consider” and “provide” to explain complex processes understandably and comprehensibly.
Die Ergebnisse, deren Validität umfassend überprüft worden war, dienen als Grundlage für weiterführende Analysen und Publikationen.;The results, whose validity had been thoroughly checked, serve as the basis for further analyses and publications.
Zumal die Datensätze heterogen waren, erforderte die statistische Auswertung eine besonders sorgfältige methodische Herangehensweise.;Especially since the datasets were heterogeneous, the statistical evaluation required a particularly careful methodological approach.
Die Forscherin stellte klar, dass sämtliche Hypothesen nur unter Berücksichtigung aller Einflussfaktoren überprüft werden dürften, um belastbare Ergebnisse zu erhalten.;The researcher clarified that all hypotheses should only be tested taking all influencing factors into account to obtain reliable results.
Eingedenk der bisherigen Experimente entschied sich das Team, die Versuchsreihen vorsichtig zu modifizieren und zusätzliche Kontrollvariablen zu implementieren.;Mindful of the previous experiments, the team decided to cautiously modify the test series and implement additional control variables.
Die Analyse, die sämtliche Variablen berücksichtigte, lieferte belastbare Ergebnisse für die anschließende Publikation und wissenschaftliche Diskussion.;The analysis, which considered all variables, provided reliable results for the subsequent publication and scientific discussion.
Nichtsdestoweniger mussten zusätzliche Messungen durchgeführt werden, um die Validität und Aussagekraft der Ergebnisse abzusichern.;Nonetheless, additional measurements had to be carried out to secure the validity and significance of the results.
Die Forscher nutzten anticipatory-es-Konstruktionen, um die zentralen Thesen der Untersuchung präzise einzuleiten und klar zu strukturieren.;The researchers used anticipatory “es” constructions to introduce the central theses of the study precisely and structure them clearly.
Indem die Abteilung standardisierte Verfahren implementierte, konnte die Vergleichbarkeit der Ergebnisse signifikant verbessert werden, wodurch eine fundierte Analyse ermöglicht wurde.;By implementing standardized procedures, the department was able to significantly improve the comparability of the results, thereby enabling a well-founded analysis.
Die Veröffentlichung, deren Argumentationslogik besonders stringent war, gilt als wegweisend für künftige wissenschaftliche Arbeiten und Studien.;The publication, whose argumentative logic was particularly stringent, is considered groundbreaking for future scientific work and studies.
Die Untersuchung zeigte, wobei alle relevanten Variablen berücksichtigt wurden, dass kausale Zusammenhänge zwischen den Faktoren bestehen und in zukünftigen Analysen berücksichtigt werden müssen.;The study showed, taking all relevant variables into account, that causal relationships exist between the factors and must be considered in future analyses.
Die interdisziplinäre Arbeitsgruppe überprüfte die komplexe Datenerhebung erneut, wobei sämtliche potenziellen Verzerrungen systematisch identifiziert und kritisch reflektiert wurden.;The interdisciplinary working group reviewed the complex data collection again, whereby all potential distortions were systematically identified and critically reflected upon.
Vorausgesetzt, dass die theoretischen Prämissen nachvollziehbar begründet worden sind, lässt sich die innovative Hypothese kohärent in das bestehende Forschungsparadigma integrieren.;Provided that the theoretical premises have been convincingly justified, the innovative hypothesis can be coherently integrated into the existing research paradigm.
Die leitende Wissenschaftlerin betonte im Konjunktiv I, die bisherigen Ergebnisse seien lediglich als vorläufige Indizien zu verstehen.;The leading scientist emphasized in the subjunctive I that the previous results were to be understood merely as preliminary indications.
Insofern als die empirischen Befunde konsistent erscheinen, kann von einer belastbaren Korrelation ausgegangen werden.;Insofar as the empirical findings appear consistent, a reliable correlation can be assumed.
Die detaillierte Analyse, deren methodologische Fundierung außerordentlich differenziert war, eröffnete neue Perspektiven für weiterführende Untersuchungen.;The detailed analysis, whose methodological foundation was extraordinarily differentiated, opened new perspectives for further investigations.
Nichtsdestotrotz blieb die kritische Frage unbeantwortet, ob die signifikanten Abweichungen tatsächlich kausal erklärbar seien.;Nevertheless, the critical question remained unanswered whether the significant deviations were in fact causally explicable.
Die komplexe Modellrechnung, durchgeführt unter streng kontrollierten Laborbedingungen, lieferte überraschend präzise Prognosen.;The complex model calculation, carried out under strictly controlled laboratory conditions, delivered surprisingly precise forecasts.
Es ist davon auszugehen, dass die sorgfältig dokumentierten Beobachtungen eine valide Grundlage für zukünftige Metaanalysen bilden.;It is to be assumed that the carefully documented observations form a valid basis for future meta-analyses.
Zumal die sozioökonomischen Rahmenbedingungen erheblich schwankten, mussten die statistischen Parameter flexibel angepasst werden.;Especially since the socioeconomic conditions fluctuated considerably, the statistical parameters had to be adjusted flexibly.
Die Forscher erklärten, die theoretischen Annahmen hätten sich im Verlauf der longitudinalen Studie signifikant verändert.;The researchers explained that the theoretical assumptions had changed significantly over the course of the longitudinal study.
Insoweit als die erhobenen Daten repräsentativ sind, können verallgemeinernde Aussagen mit gebotener Vorsicht formuliert werden.;Insofar as the collected data are representative, generalizing statements can be formulated with due caution.
Die methodisch anspruchsvolle Untersuchung, deren Ergebnisse kontrovers diskutiert wurden, trug wesentlich zur Differenzierung der Debatte bei.;The methodologically demanding study, whose results were controversially discussed, contributed significantly to the differentiation of the debate.
Die Projektleitung zog in Betracht, zusätzliche qualitative Interviews durchzuführen, um die bisherigen Erkenntnisse zu vertiefen.;The project management considered conducting additional qualitative interviews in order to deepen the previous findings.
Es bedarf einer präzisen Definition der zentralen Begriffe, damit die argumentative Struktur nachvollziehbar bleibt.;It requires a precise definition of the central terms so that the argumentative structure remains comprehensible.
Die Studie kommt zu dem Ergebnis, dass die beobachteten Effekte nicht isoliert betrachtet werden dürften.;The study comes to the conclusion that the observed effects should not be considered in isolation.
Eingedenk der ethischen Implikationen entschied sich das Forschungsteam, die sensiblen Daten anonymisiert zu veröffentlichen.;Mindful of the ethical implications, the research team decided to publish the sensitive data anonymously.
Die theoretische Abhandlung, deren sprachliche Präzision außerordentlich bemerkenswert ist, gilt als paradigmatisch für die Disziplin.;The theoretical treatise, whose linguistic precision is extraordinarily remarkable, is considered paradigmatic for the discipline.
Nichtsdestoweniger zeigte sich, dass die vermeintlich eindeutigen Resultate einer differenzierten Interpretation bedurften.;Nonetheless, it became apparent that the supposedly clear results required a differentiated interpretation.
Die statistische Auswertung erfolgte unter Berücksichtigung sämtlicher relevanter Kovariablen, wodurch die Aussagekraft signifikant erhöht wurde.;The statistical evaluation was carried out taking all relevant covariates into account, thereby significantly increasing its explanatory power.
Die Autoren führten aus, die methodischen Einschränkungen seien transparent offengelegt worden.;The authors stated that the methodological limitations had been transparently disclosed.
Vorausgesetzt, dass die finanziellen Ressourcen langfristig gesichert sind, kann das ambitionierte Forschungsprojekt nachhaltig fortgeführt werden.;Provided that the financial resources are secured in the long term, the ambitious research project can be continued sustainably.
Die Untersuchung legt nahe, dass die komplexen Wechselwirkungen nur durch eine interdisziplinäre Herangehensweise adäquat erfasst werden können.;The study suggests that the complex interactions can only be adequately captured through an interdisciplinary approach.
Insofern als die Ergebnisse reproduzierbar sind, stärken sie die Glaubwürdigkeit der gesamten Studie.;Insofar as the results are reproducible, they strengthen the credibility of the entire study.
Die differenziert formulierte Schlussfolgerung, deren argumentative Kohärenz überzeugte, wurde in der Fachwelt positiv aufgenommen.;The carefully formulated conclusion, whose argumentative coherence was convincing, was positively received in the professional community.
Es erscheint plausibel, dass die langfristigen Effekte bislang unterschätzt worden sind.;It appears plausible that the long-term effects have so far been underestimated.
Die umfassende Literaturrecherche, durchgeführt unter strengen wissenschaftlichen Kriterien, offenbarte erhebliche Forschungslücken.;The comprehensive literature review, conducted under strict academic criteria, revealed considerable research gaps.
Nichtsdestotrotz bleibt zu klären, inwiefern die theoretischen Modelle praktisch anwendbar sind.;Nevertheless, it remains to be clarified to what extent the theoretical models are practically applicable.
Die Forscher betonten, die bisherigen Annahmen seien kritisch zu hinterfragen und gegebenenfalls zu revidieren.;The researchers emphasized that the previous assumptions were to be critically questioned and, if necessary, revised.
Insoweit als institutionelle Rahmenbedingungen eine Rolle spielen, müssen diese explizit in die Analyse einbezogen werden.;Insofar as institutional conditions play a role, they must be explicitly included in the analysis.
Die sorgfältig ausgearbeitete Publikation, deren differenzierte Argumentationsweise hervorsticht, leistet einen wesentlichen Beitrag zur aktuellen Fachdiskussion.;The carefully elaborated publication, whose differentiated argumentative style stands out, makes a significant contribution to the current professional debate.
Wenngleich die sorgfältig ausgearbeitete Argumentation in sich schlüssig erschien, blieb ihre praktische Umsetzbarkeit unter realistischen Bedingungen zweifelhaft.;Although the carefully elaborated argumentation appeared internally coherent, its practical feasibility under realistic conditions remained doubtful.
Wiewohl die empirischen Befunde beeindruckend konsistent wirkten, ließen sich alternative Deutungen keineswegs vollständig ausschließen.;Although the empirical findings seemed impressively consistent, alternative interpretations could by no means be entirely excluded.
Alldieweil die institutionellen Rahmenbedingungen sich grundlegend gewandelt hatten, mussten die strategischen Zielsetzungen neu definiert werden.;Since the institutional conditions had fundamentally changed, the strategic objectives had to be redefined.
Kraft seiner langjährigen wissenschaftlichen Erfahrung vermochte der renommierte Gutachter die komplexe Problemlage erstaunlich präzise einzuschätzen.;By virtue of his many years of academic experience, the renowned reviewer was able to assess the complex situation remarkably precisely.
Vermittels einer eigens entwickelten, hochgradig differenzierten Analysemethode gelang es dem interdisziplinären Team, verborgene Zusammenhänge sichtbar zu machen.;By means of a specially developed, highly differentiated analytical method, the interdisciplinary team succeeded in making hidden connections visible.
Unbeschadet berechtigter Kritik an einzelnen methodischen Details behielt die grundlegende These ihre argumentative Überzeugungskraft.;Notwithstanding justified criticism of certain methodological details, the fundamental thesis retained its argumentative persuasiveness.
Eingedenk der historischen Verantwortung entschied sich die verantwortliche Kommission zu einer besonders transparenten Kommunikation.;Mindful of the historical responsibility, the responsible commission opted for particularly transparent communication.
Aus finanziellen Gründen halber wurde das ambitionierte Großprojekt schließlich überraschend eingestellt.;For financial reasons, the ambitious large-scale project was ultimately discontinued.
Dieweil die politischen Entscheidungsprozesse sich ungewöhnlich langwierig gestalteten, verzögerte sich die Implementierung der Reformmaßnahmen erheblich.;While the political decision-making processes proved unusually lengthy, the implementation of the reform measures was significantly delayed.
Indes blieb die zentrale Fragestellung trotz intensiver Debatten weiterhin ungelöst im Raum stehen.;Meanwhile, the central question remained unresolved despite intensive debates.
Mitnichten war die vermeintlich einfache Lösung so überzeugend, wie sie auf den ersten Blick erschien.;By no means was the supposedly simple solution as convincing as it appeared at first glance.
Schlechterdings unhaltbar erschien dem kritischen Beobachter die allzu optimistische Prognose des euphorischen Vorstands.;The overly optimistic forecast of the euphoric board appeared absolutely untenable to the critical observer.
Gleichwohl erkannte man in der differenzierten Stellungnahme einen ernstzunehmenden Versuch sachlicher Vermittlung.;Nevertheless, one recognized in the differentiated statement a serious attempt at objective mediation.
Das ist ja wohl kaum eine tragfähige, langfristig durchdachte Strategie, meinte der skeptische Analyst leise.;That is surely hardly a sustainable, long-term strategy, the skeptical analyst remarked quietly.
Du hättest doch zumindest mal die ausführliche Dokumentation gründlich durchlesen können.;You could at least have read through the detailed documentation thoroughly.
Sei es, dass unerwartete externe Faktoren die Prognose verfälschten, sei es, dass interne Planungsfehler vorlagen, die Ursachen blieben komplex.;Whether unexpected external factors distorted the forecast or internal planning errors existed, the causes remained complex.
Man lasse sich von der oberflächlich überzeugenden Präsentation nicht vorschnell blenden.;One should not allow oneself to be prematurely dazzled by the superficially convincing presentation.
Zu bedenken wäre ferner, ob die langfristigen sozioökonomischen Konsequenzen hinreichend berücksichtigt worden sind.;It would furthermore be worth considering whether the long-term socioeconomic consequences have been sufficiently taken into account.
So deutlich war die implizite Kritik formuliert, dass sie selbst von unerfahrenen Zuhörern unmittelbar verstanden wurde.;So clearly was the implicit criticism formulated that it was immediately understood even by inexperienced listeners.
Kaum hatte die ambitionierte Reforminitiative an Fahrt gewonnen, da regte sich bereits unerwartet heftiger Widerstand.;Hardly had the ambitious reform initiative gained momentum when unexpectedly strong resistance arose.
Wenngleich der literarisch anspruchsvolle Text stellenweise bewusst mehrdeutig gestaltet war, erschloss sich seine zentrale Botschaft dem geduldigen Leser schließlich dennoch.;Although the literarily sophisticated text was deliberately ambiguous in places, its central message ultimately revealed itself to the patient reader nonetheless.
Alldieweil die ökonomischen Rahmenbedingungen prekär geblieben waren, erwies sich die vorsichtig formulierte Prognose als erstaunlich zutreffend.;Since the economic conditions had remained precarious, the cautiously formulated forecast proved surprisingly accurate.
Kraft verfassungsrechtlicher Bestimmungen war die unabhängige Institution befugt, weitreichende Entscheidungen autonom zu treffen.;By virtue of constitutional provisions, the independent institution was authorized to make far-reaching decisions autonomously.
Vermittels gezielter diplomatischer Interventionen konnte der eskalierende Konflikt vorerst eingedämmt werden.;By means of targeted diplomatic interventions, the escalating conflict could initially be contained.
Unbeschadet ihrer beeindruckenden Fachkompetenz blieb die junge Expertin bemerkenswert bescheiden und zurückhaltend.;Notwithstanding her impressive expertise, the young expert remained remarkably modest and reserved.
Indessen zeigte sich im Verlauf der hitzigen Debatte, dass die Positionen unvereinbar verhärtet waren.;Meanwhile, it became apparent during the heated debate that the positions had become irreconcilably entrenched.
Mitnichten lasse sich behaupten, die komplexe Problematik sei bereits abschließend geklärt.;By no means can it be claimed that the complex issue has already been conclusively resolved.
Schlechterdings unmöglich erschien es dem erfahrenen Juristen, die widersprüchlichen Aussagen widerspruchsfrei zu harmonisieren.;It appeared absolutely impossible to the experienced jurist to reconcile the contradictory statements without contradiction.
Gleichwohl war die kompromissbereite Haltung des moderaten Vermittlers ein konstruktiver Schritt in Richtung Verständigung.;Nevertheless, the compromise-oriented attitude of the moderate mediator was a constructive step toward mutual understanding.
So eindringlich hatte der engagierte Redner argumentiert, dass selbst skeptische Zuhörer ins Nachdenken gerieten.;So emphatically had the committed speaker argued that even skeptical listeners began to reflect.
Gestern habe ich mit meinen Freunden im Park Fußball gespielt.;Yesterday I played football with my friends in the park.
Wenn das Wetter schön ist, gehen wir oft am Wochenende schwimmen.;When the weather is nice, we often go swimming on the weekend.
Meine Schwester hat mir zum Geburtstag ein interessantes Buch geschenkt.;My sister gave me an interesting book for my birthday.
Ich würde gerne nächstes Jahr nach Berlin fahren und dort studieren.;I would like to go to Berlin next year and study there.
Obwohl ich müde war, habe ich bis Mitternacht für die Prüfung gelernt.;Although I was tired, I studied for the exam until midnight.
Der Mann, den ich gestern getroffen habe, war sehr freundlich und hilfsbereit.;The man whom I met yesterday was very friendly and helpful.
Nachdem ich gefrühstückt hatte, bin ich mit dem Bus zur Arbeit gefahren.;After I had eaten breakfast, I took the bus to work.
Mein Vater arbeitet seit zwanzig Jahren als Ingenieur in einer großen Firma.;My father has been working as an engineer in a large company for twenty years.
Die Kinder freuen sich schon auf die Sommerferien und den Urlaub am Meer.;The children are already looking forward to the summer holidays and the vacation at the sea.
Ich muss heute Abend meiner Mutter bei der Vorbereitung des Abendessens helfen.;I have to help my mother with the preparation of dinner this evening.
Kannst du mir bitte erklären, wie man diese komplizierte Aufgabe lösen kann.;Can you please explain to me how one can solve this complicated task.
Wir haben uns entschieden, dieses Wochenende in den Bergen wandern zu gehen.;We have decided to go hiking in the mountains this weekend.
Bevor ich ins Bett gehe, lese ich normalerweise noch ein paar Seiten.;Before I go to bed, I usually read a few more pages.
Die neue Wohnung gefällt mir sehr gut, weil sie hell und modern ist.;I like the new apartment very much because it is bright and modern.
Meine Tante hat sich das Bein gebrochen und liegt jetzt im Krankenhaus.;My aunt broke her leg and is now in the hospital.
Während meines Urlaubs habe ich viele schöne Fotos von der Landschaft gemacht.;During my vacation I took many beautiful photos of the landscape.
Der Film, den wir gestern gesehen haben, war spannend aber etwas zu lang.;The film that we saw yesterday was exciting but a bit too long.
Ich interessiere mich sehr für Geschichte und lese oft Bücher darüber.;I am very interested in history and often read books about it.
Um gesund zu bleiben, sollte man regelmäßig Sport treiben und gesund essen.;To stay healthy, one should exercise regularly and eat healthily.
Nachdem der Zug angekommen war, stiegen viele Passagiere schnell aus.;After the train had arrived, many passengers got off quickly.
Mein Bruder hat sich bei seiner Firma um eine bessere Position beworben.;My brother applied for a better position at his company.
Wenn ich mehr Zeit hätte, würde ich öfter meine Großeltern in Hamburg besuchen.;If I had more time, I would visit my grandparents in Hamburg more often.
Die Studenten müssen bis nächste Woche eine lange Hausarbeit über Klimawandel schreiben.;The students have to write a long paper about climate change by next week.
Gestern Abend sind wir in ein gemütliches Restaurant in der Altstadt gegangen.;Yesterday evening we went to a cozy restaurant in the old town.
Ich habe versucht, ihn anzurufen, aber er hat leider nicht geantwortet.;I tried to call him, but unfortunately he didn't answer.
Bevor du die Entscheidung triffst, solltest du dir alles genau überlegen.;Before you make the decision, you should think about everything carefully.
Meine Nachbarin hat mir erzählt, dass sie bald nach Österreich umziehen wird.;My neighbor told me that she will move to Austria soon.
Der Arzt hat mir geraten, mehr Wasser zu trinken und weniger Kaffee.;The doctor advised me to drink more water and less coffee.
Wir mussten lange auf den Bus warten, weil er wegen des Verkehrs verspätet war.;We had to wait a long time for the bus because it was delayed due to traffic.
Ich finde es wichtig, dass Kinder früh eine Fremdsprache lernen können.;I think it is important that children can learn a foreign language early.
Nachdem ich die Nachrichten gelesen hatte, war ich über die Situation sehr besorgt.;After I had read the news, I was very worried about the situation.
Mein Onkel hat mir empfohlen, während des Studiums ein Praktikum zu machen.;My uncle recommended that I do an internship during my studies.
Die Lehrerin hat den Schülern erklärt, warum diese Regel so wichtig ist.;The teacher explained to the students why this rule is so important.
Obwohl es stark geregnet hat, sind wir trotzdem zum Konzert gegangen.;Although it rained heavily, we went to the concert anyway.
Ich hatte gehofft, dass du mir bei diesem schwierigen Problem helfen könntest.;I had hoped that you could help me with this difficult problem.
Die Regierung plant, in den nächsten Jahren mehr Geld für Bildung auszugeben.;The government plans to spend more money on education in the coming years.
Seit drei Monaten lerne ich Deutsch und kann schon einfache Gespräche führen.;I have been learning German for three months and can already have simple conversations.
Meine Freundin hat sich beschwert, dass die Wohnung zu teuer geworden ist.;My girlfriend complained that the apartment has become too expensive.
Wenn du dich nicht beeilst, werden wir den Zug nach München verpassen.;If you don't hurry, we will miss the train to Munich.
Der Chef hat gesagt, dass alle Mitarbeiter pünktlich zur Besprechung kommen sollen.;The boss said that all employees should come to the meeting on time.
Ich habe vergessen, die Tür abzuschließen, bevor ich das Haus verlassen habe.;I forgot to lock the door before I left the house.
Die Kinder durften gestern Abend länger aufbleiben und einen Film anschauen.;The children were allowed to stay up longer last night and watch a movie.
Während der Präsentation haben viele Leute wichtige Fragen zu dem Projekt gestellt.;During the presentation, many people asked important questions about the project.
Ich weiß nicht, ob ich nächstes Jahr genug Geld für die Reise haben werde.;I don't know if I will have enough money for the trip next year.
Mein Kollege hat sich über das schlechte Wetter und die Kälte beschwert.;My colleague complained about the bad weather and the cold.
Nachdem sie die Prüfung bestanden hatte, feierte sie mit ihrer ganzen Familie.;After she had passed the exam, she celebrated with her whole family.
Der Verkäufer hat uns verschiedene Modelle gezeigt und alle Vorteile erklärt.;The salesman showed us different models and explained all the advantages.
Ich muss noch schnell einkaufen gehen, bevor die Geschäfte heute Abend schließen.;I still have to go shopping quickly before the stores close this evening.
Die Ärzte haben herausgefunden, dass eine gesunde Ernährung sehr wichtig für uns ist.;The doctors have found out that a healthy diet is very important for us.
Obwohl der Kellner sehr freundlich war, hat das Essen uns nicht gut geschmeckt.;Although the waiter was very friendly, we didn't like the food.
Ich habe gehört, dass in dieser Stadt viele internationale Firmen ansässig sind.;I heard that many international companies are based in this city.
Meine Mutter möchte, dass ich ihr öfter bei der Hausarbeit helfe und aufräume.;My mother wants me to help her more often with the housework and tidy up.
Wenn das Projekt erfolgreich ist, werden wir nächstes Jahr mehr Mitarbeiter einstellen.;If the project is successful, we will hire more employees next year.
Der Professor hat den Studenten empfohlen, mehr wissenschaftliche Artikel zu lesen und zu diskutieren.;The professor recommended that the students read and discuss more scientific articles.
Wir haben beschlossen, unseren Urlaub zu verschieben, weil mein Mann krank geworden ist.;We decided to postpone our vacation because my husband became ill.
Die Polizei hat den Unfall untersucht und einen ausführlichen Bericht darüber geschrieben.;The police investigated the accident and wrote a detailed report about it.
Ich habe mich gefragt, warum sie mir nicht die Wahrheit über die Situation erzählt hat.;I wondered why she didn't tell me the truth about the situation.
Nachdem wir das Museum besucht hatten, gingen wir in ein Café und tranken Kaffee.;After we had visited the museum, we went to a café and drank coffee.
Mein Freund hat mir versprochen, dass er mir bei dem Umzug helfen wird.;My friend promised me that he will help me with the move.
Die Politiker diskutieren gerade über neue Gesetze zum Schutz der Umwelt und Natur.;The politicians are currently discussing new laws to protect the environment and nature.
Ich würde lieber zu Hause bleiben, anstatt bei diesem schrecklichen Wetter rauszugehen.;I would rather stay at home instead of going out in this terrible weather.
Der Mechaniker hat erklärt, dass die Reparatur des Autos mindestens drei Tage dauern wird.;The mechanic explained that the repair of the car will take at least three days.
Obwohl ich viel gelernt habe, habe ich die Mathematikprüfung leider nicht bestanden.;Although I studied a lot, I unfortunately did not pass the mathematics exam.
Die Touristen haben sich über die schöne Architektur und die freundlichen Menschen gefreut.;The tourists were happy about the beautiful architecture and the friendly people.
Ich kann dir leider nicht sagen, wann der nächste Bus zur Universität fahren wird.;Unfortunately I cannot tell you when the next bus to the university will leave.
Meine Schwester hat sich entschieden, nach dem Abitur ein Jahr ins Ausland zu gehen.;My sister has decided to go abroad for a year after graduating from high school.
Bevor wir in den Urlaub fahren, müssen wir noch viele wichtige Dinge organisieren.;Before we go on vacation, we still have to organize many important things.
Der Journalist hat einen interessanten Artikel über die wirtschaftliche Entwicklung des Landes geschrieben.;The journalist wrote an interesting article about the economic development of the country.
Wenn ich im Lotto gewinnen würde, würde ich ein großes Haus kaufen und reisen.;If I won the lottery, I would buy a big house and travel.
Die Schüler haben sich darüber gefreut, dass der Lehrer die Hausaufgaben nicht kontrolliert hat.;The students were happy that the teacher did not check the homework.
Ich habe versucht, das Problem selbst zu lösen, aber es war einfach zu kompliziert.;I tried to solve the problem myself, but it was simply too complicated.
Nachdem der Regen aufgehört hatte, kam die Sonne wieder heraus und es wurde wärmer.;After the rain had stopped, the sun came out again and it got warmer.
Mein Bruder interessiert sich sehr für Technologie und möchte Informatik studieren.;My brother is very interested in technology and wants to study computer science.
Die Firma hat angekündigt, dass sie viele neue Arbeitsplätze in der Region schaffen wird.;The company announced that it will create many new jobs in the region.
Ich hoffe, dass du dich schnell von deiner Krankheit erholst und gesund wirst.;I hope that you recover quickly from your illness and get well.
Obwohl die Wohnung klein ist, fühlen wir uns dort sehr wohl und glücklich.;Although the apartment is small, we feel very comfortable and happy there.
Der Busfahrer hat uns gesagt, dass wir an der nächsten Haltestelle aussteigen müssen.;The bus driver told us that we have to get off at the next stop.
Ich habe meinen alten Freund zufällig auf der Straße getroffen und mich sehr gefreut.;I met my old friend by chance on the street and was very happy.
Wenn du mehr über dieses Thema erfahren möchtest, solltest du im Internet recherchieren.;If you want to learn more about this topic, you should do research on the internet.
Die Mitarbeiter haben sich beschwert, dass sie zu viele Überstunden machen müssen.;The employees complained that they have to work too much overtime.
Nachdem ich das Buch gelesen hatte, verstand ich endlich die Hauptidee der Geschichte.;After I had read the book, I finally understood the main idea of the story.
Meine Eltern haben mir erlaubt, mit meinen Freunden übers Wochenende wegzufahren.;My parents allowed me to go away with my friends for the weekend.
Der Bürgermeister hat versprochen, mehr Geld für öffentliche Verkehrsmittel und Parks auszugeben.;The mayor promised to spend more money on public transport and parks.
Ich finde es schade, dass wir uns so selten sehen und miteinander sprechen können.;I think it's a shame that we see each other so rarely and can talk to each other.
Obwohl er sehr talentiert ist, hat er noch nicht die richtige Arbeitsstelle gefunden.;Although he is very talented, he has not yet found the right job.
Die Studenten müssen während des Semesters mehrere wichtige Projekte und Präsentationen abgeben.;The students have to submit several important projects and presentations during the semester.
Ich hatte gedacht, dass die Konferenz interessanter sein würde als sie war.;I had thought that the conference would be more interesting than it was.
Nachdem wir das Auto geparkt hatten, liefen wir durch die malerische Altstadt.;After we had parked the car, we walked through the picturesque old town.
Meine Cousine hat sich für einen Sprachkurs angemeldet, um ihr Englisch zu verbessern.;My cousin registered for a language course to improve her English.
Der Minister hat erklärt, warum die neuen Reformen für die Zukunft wichtig sind.;The minister explained why the new reforms are important for the future.
Wenn du Fragen zu diesem Thema hast, kannst du mich jederzeit gerne anrufen.;If you have questions about this topic, you can call me anytime.
Ich habe beschlossen, weniger Fleisch zu essen und mehr vegetarische Gerichte zu kochen.;I have decided to eat less meat and cook more vegetarian dishes.
Die Kinder haben den ganzen Nachmittag im Garten gespielt und viel Spaß gehabt.;The children played in the garden all afternoon and had a lot of fun.
Obwohl ich nicht viel Erfahrung hatte, hat mich die Firma trotzdem eingestellt.;Although I didn't have much experience, the company hired me anyway.
Der Lehrer hat den Eltern mitgeteilt, dass ihre Kinder große Fortschritte gemacht haben.;The teacher informed the parents that their children have made great progress.
Ich werde versuchen, früher aufzustehen, damit ich mehr Zeit für das Frühstück habe.;I will try to get up earlier so that I have more time for breakfast.
Nachdem sie ihre Ausbildung abgeschlossen hatte, begann sie sofort mit der Arbeit.;After she had completed her training, she immediately started working.
Mein Chef hat mir geraten, an einem Fortbildungskurs teilzunehmen und mich weiterzubilden.;My boss advised me to participate in a further training course and continue my education.
Die Nachbarn haben sich über den Lärm beschwert, der jeden Abend zu hören ist.;The neighbors complained about the noise that can be heard every evening.
Wenn das Wetter morgen besser wird, können wir endlich unseren Ausflug machen.;If the weather gets better tomorrow, we can finally make our trip.
Ich habe vergessen, meinen Regenschirm mitzunehmen, und bin völlig nass geworden.;I forgot to take my umbrella and got completely wet.
Der Direktor hat betont, dass Teamarbeit und Kommunikation sehr wichtig für den Erfolg sind.;The director emphasized that teamwork and communication are very important for success.
Obwohl die Preise gestiegen sind, kaufen viele Menschen immer noch gerne dort ein.;Although the prices have increased, many people still like to shop there.
Ich möchte gerne wissen, ob du mir bei der Vorbereitung der Party helfen kannst.;I would like to know if you can help me with the preparation of the party.
Meine Freunde haben vorgeschlagen, dass wir nächsten Sommer zusammen nach Italien fahren.;My friends suggested that we go to Italy together next summer.
Nachdem der Vortrag beendet war, stellten die Zuhörer viele interessante Fragen zum Thema.;After the lecture was over, the audience asked many interesting questions about the topic.
Der Arzt hat empfohlen, dass ich mehr Sport treiben und mich gesünder ernähren sollte.;The doctor recommended that I should exercise more and eat healthier.
Ich habe gehört, dass diese Universität einen sehr guten Ruf in Europa hat.;I heard that this university has a very good reputation in Europe.
Wenn ich genug Geld gespart habe, werde ich mir endlich ein neues Auto kaufen.;When I have saved enough money, I will finally buy myself a new car.
Die Politiker haben versprochen, die Probleme im Gesundheitssystem schnell zu lösen.;The politicians promised to solve the problems in the healthcare system quickly.
Obwohl er sehr nervös war, hat er seine Präsentation sehr gut und überzeugend gemacht.;Although he was very nervous, he gave his presentation very well and convincingly.
Ich muss noch die Wäsche waschen und das Zimmer aufräumen, bevor die Gäste kommen.;I still have to wash the laundry and tidy up the room before the guests arrive.
Meine Tante hat erzählt, dass sie früher in vielen verschiedenen Ländern gelebt hat.;My aunt told me that she used to live in many different countries.
Der Trainer hat den Spielern gesagt, dass sie härter trainieren und konzentrierter spielen müssen.;The coach told the players that they have to train harder and play more focused.
Nachdem ich den Artikel gelesen hatte, änderte sich meine Meinung zu diesem Thema komplett.;After I had read the article, my opinion on this topic changed completely.
Ich würde gerne mehr Zeit mit meiner Familie verbringen, aber ich arbeite zu viel.;I would like to spend more time with my family, but I work too much.
Die Forscher haben entdeckt, dass regelmäßige Bewegung das Risiko für Krankheiten senkt.;The researchers discovered that regular exercise reduces the risk of diseases.
Wenn du mir nicht glaubst, kannst du selbst im Internet nach Informationen suchen.;If you don't believe me, you can search for information on the internet yourself.
Mein Vater hat mir beigebracht, wie man Auto fährt und sich im Verkehr verhält.;My father taught me how to drive a car and behave in traffic.
Die Lehrerin hat die Schüler gebeten, ihre Handys während des Unterrichts auszuschalten.;The teacher asked the students to turn off their mobile phones during class.
Obwohl wir uns erst seit kurzem kennen, verstehen wir uns schon sehr gut.;Although we have only known each other for a short time, we already get along very well.
Ich habe beschlossen, mehr Zeit in der Natur zu verbringen und öfter wandern zu gehen.;I have decided to spend more time in nature and go hiking more often.
Der Lehrer erklärte uns gestern die wichtigsten Regeln der deutschen Grammatik sehr ausführlich.;The teacher explained to us yesterday the most important rules of German grammar very thoroughly.
Meine Großmutter backt jeden Sonntag einen köstlichen Apfelkuchen für die ganze Familie.;My grandmother bakes a delicious apple cake for the whole family every Sunday.
Wir haben beschlossen, unser altes Fahrrad zu verkaufen und ein neues zu kaufen.;We have decided to sell our old bicycle and buy a new one.
Der Zug hatte zwanzig Minuten Verspätung, deshalb verpassten wir unseren Anschluss nach Stuttgart.;The train was twenty minutes late, therefore we missed our connection to Stuttgart.
Ich freue mich darauf, nächsten Monat meine beste Freundin in Wien zu besuchen.;I am looking forward to visiting my best friend in Vienna next month.
Nachdem er seine Hausaufgaben gemacht hatte, durfte er draußen mit seinen Freunden spielen.;After he had done his homework, he was allowed to play outside with his friends.
Die Ärztin hat meinem Großvater neue Medikamente verschrieben, die ihm hoffentlich helfen werden.;The doctor prescribed new medications to my grandfather that will hopefully help him.
Obwohl das Restaurant sehr voll war, haben wir sofort einen schönen Tisch bekommen.;Although the restaurant was very full, we immediately got a nice table.
Mein Bruder hat sich ein neues Smartphone gekauft, weil sein altes kaputt gegangen ist.;My brother bought himself a new smartphone because his old one broke.
Wenn ich Zeit hätte, würde ich gerne einen Tanzkurs besuchen und Salsa lernen.;If I had time, I would like to attend a dance course and learn salsa.
Die Studenten haben fleißig für die Abschlussprüfung gelernt und hoffen auf gute Ergebnisse.;The students studied diligently for the final exam and hope for good results.
Ich bin heute früher nach Hause gegangen, weil ich mich nicht wohl gefühlt habe.;I went home earlier today because I did not feel well.
Der Kellner brachte uns die Speisekarte und empfahl uns das Tagesgericht mit Fisch.;The waiter brought us the menu and recommended the daily special with fish.
Meine Eltern haben mir verboten, bis spät in die Nacht auf Partys zu gehen.;My parents forbade me to go to parties until late at night.
Nachdem wir das Konzert besucht hatten, unterhielten wir uns noch lange über die Musik.;After we had attended the concert, we talked for a long time about the music.
Der Bürgermeister verspricht, neue Fahrradwege in der ganzen Stadt bauen zu lassen.;The mayor promises to have new bicycle paths built throughout the city.
Ich muss heute noch zur Bank gehen und Geld für die Miete abheben.;I still have to go to the bank today and withdraw money for the rent.
Obwohl sie sehr jung ist, spricht meine Nichte schon drei Sprachen fließend.;Although she is very young, my niece already speaks three languages fluently.
Der Pilot hat den Passagieren mitgeteilt, dass wir in zehn Minuten landen werden.;The pilot informed the passengers that we will land in ten minutes.
Wenn du Hilfe brauchst, kannst du mich jederzeit anrufen oder mir schreiben.;If you need help, you can call me or write to me anytime.
Meine Kollegin hat sich bei der Arbeit verletzt und musste zum Arzt gehen.;My colleague injured herself at work and had to go to the doctor.
Die Kinder haben im Garten einen kleinen Gemüsegarten angelegt und Tomaten gepflanzt.;The children created a small vegetable garden in the yard and planted tomatoes.
Ich habe vergessen, die Fenster zu schließen, bevor das Gewitter angefangen hat.;I forgot to close the windows before the thunderstorm started.
Nachdem der Film zu Ende war, diskutierten wir über die interessante Handlung.;After the movie was over, we discussed the interesting plot.
Der Professor hat uns erklärt, warum wir diese wissenschaftliche Methode anwenden sollten.;The professor explained to us why we should apply this scientific method.
Mein Onkel arbeitet als Architekt und hat schon viele moderne Gebäude entworfen.;My uncle works as an architect and has already designed many modern buildings.
Obwohl ich müde bin, muss ich heute Abend noch einen wichtigen Bericht schreiben.;Although I am tired, I still have to write an important report this evening.
Wir haben uns für das neue Fitnessstudio angemeldet, um regelmäßig trainieren zu können.;We registered for the new gym in order to be able to train regularly.
Der Handwerker hat versprochen, morgen früh zu kommen und die Heizung zu reparieren.;The craftsman promised to come tomorrow morning and repair the heating.
Wenn das Wetter schön bleibt, werden wir morgen an den See fahren und schwimmen.;If the weather stays nice, we will drive to the lake tomorrow and swim.
Ich habe gehört, dass in diesem Geschäft alles billiger ist als in anderen Läden.;I heard that everything is cheaper in this store than in other shops.
Meine Freundin hat mir erzählt, dass sie bald eine neue Stelle in Frankfurt anfängt.;My friend told me that she will soon start a new job in Frankfurt.
Nachdem ich das Rezept gelesen hatte, kaufte ich alle notwendigen Zutaten im Supermarkt.;After I had read the recipe, I bought all the necessary ingredients at the supermarket.
Der Zahnarzt hat mir gesagt, dass ich meine Zähne dreimal täglich putzen sollte.;The dentist told me that I should brush my teeth three times a day.
Obwohl der Weg sehr weit war, sind wir den ganzen Weg zu Fuß gegangen.;Although the way was very far, we walked the entire way on foot.
Ich möchte wissen, ob du schon eine Entscheidung über deine Zukunftspläne getroffen hast.;I would like to know if you have already made a decision about your future plans.
Die Politiker diskutieren über eine neue Steuerreform, die nächstes Jahr eingeführt werden soll.;The politicians are discussing a new tax reform that should be introduced next year.
Mein Vater hat mir beigebracht, wie man ein Konto eröffnet und Geld spart.;My father taught me how to open an account and save money.
Wenn ich in Rente gehe, möchte ich viel reisen und neue Kulturen kennenlernen.;When I retire, I want to travel a lot and get to know new cultures.
Der Mechaniker hat festgestellt, dass der Motor des Autos dringend ausgetauscht werden muss.;The mechanic determined that the engine of the car urgently needs to be replaced.
Ich habe mich geärgert, dass der Bus schon wieder zu spät gekommen ist.;I was annoyed that the bus came late again.
Nachdem sie das Studium abgeschlossen hatte, fand sie schnell eine interessante Arbeitsstelle.;After she had completed her studies, she quickly found an interesting job.
Meine Schwester interessiert sich sehr für Kunst und besucht oft Museen und Galerien.;My sister is very interested in art and often visits museums and galleries.
Obwohl ich ihm mehrmals geschrieben habe, hat er noch nicht auf meine Nachricht geantwortet.;Although I wrote to him several times, he has not yet responded to my message.
Der Vermieter hat angekündigt, dass die Miete ab nächstem Monat um zehn Prozent steigt.;The landlord announced that the rent will increase by ten percent starting next month.
Wenn du fleißig lernst, wirst du die Prüfung sicherlich ohne Probleme bestehen können.;If you study diligently, you will certainly be able to pass the exam without problems.
Ich habe beschlossen, weniger Zucker zu essen und mehr frisches Obst zu kaufen.;I have decided to eat less sugar and buy more fresh fruit.
Die Nachbarn haben sich darüber beschwert, dass unsere Musik zu laut gewesen ist.;The neighbors complained that our music was too loud.
Nachdem wir die Stadt besichtigt hatten, fuhren wir mit dem Auto zurück zum Hotel.;After we had visited the city, we drove back to the hotel by car.
Mein Cousin hat sich vorgenommen, nächstes Jahr mit dem Rauchen aufzuhören und gesünder zu leben.;My cousin has resolved to quit smoking next year and live healthier.
Der Direktor hat allen Mitarbeitern gratuliert, weil das Projekt erfolgreich abgeschlossen wurde.;The director congratulated all employees because the project was successfully completed.
Obwohl ich noch nie in Spanien war, kann ich schon ein bisschen Spanisch sprechen.;Although I have never been to Spain, I can already speak a little Spanish.
Ich werde versuchen, pünktlich zu sein, damit wir genug Zeit für das Meeting haben.;I will try to be on time so that we have enough time for the meeting.
Die Touristen haben viele schöne Souvenirs gekauft und Fotos von den Sehenswürdigkeiten gemacht.;The tourists bought many beautiful souvenirs and took photos of the sights.
Wenn ich Urlaub habe, schlafe ich gerne lange und verbringe Zeit mit meiner Familie.;When I have vacation, I like to sleep late and spend time with my family.
Mein Chef hat mir erlaubt, zwei Tage im Monat von zu Hause zu arbeiten.;My boss allowed me to work from home two days a month.
Nachdem der Unterricht beendet war, gingen wir alle zusammen in die Mensa essen.;After the class was over, we all went to the cafeteria together to eat.
Die Wissenschaftler haben bewiesen, dass diese neue Methode sehr effektiv und sicher ist.;The scientists have proven that this new method is very effective and safe.
Obwohl der Laden geschlossen war, konnten wir unsere Bestellung online aufgeben.;Although the store was closed, we were able to place our order online.
Ich hoffe sehr, dass du dich bald von deiner Operation erholst und gesund wirst.;I very much hope that you will soon recover from your operation and get well.
Der Richter hat entschieden, dass der Angeklagte eine Geldstrafe zahlen muss.;The judge decided that the defendant must pay a fine.
Meine Mutter hat mir geraten, warm anzuziehen, weil es draußen sehr kalt ist.;My mother advised me to dress warmly because it is very cold outside.
Wenn ich könnte, würde ich jeden Tag am Strand liegen und die Sonne genießen.;If I could, I would lie on the beach every day and enjoy the sun.
Nachdem ich den Vertrag unterschrieben hatte, gab mir der Verkäufer die Schlüssel.;After I had signed the contract, the seller gave me the keys.
Die Schüler haben sich darauf gefreut, dass die Sommerferien endlich begonnen haben.;The students were happy that the summer vacation has finally started.
Ich muss noch schnell zur Post gehen und ein wichtiges Paket abschicken.;I still have to go to the post office quickly and send an important package.
Obwohl er wenig Geld hat, ist er immer großzügig und hilft anderen Menschen.;Although he has little money, he is always generous and helps other people.
Der Trainer hat die Mannschaft gelobt, weil sie das Spiel fair gespielt hat.;The coach praised the team because they played the game fairly.
Meine Tante hat uns eingeladen, Weihnachten bei ihr zu Hause zu feiern.;My aunt invited us to celebrate Christmas at her home.
Wenn du möchtest, können wir morgen zusammen ins Kino gehen und einen Film ansehen.;If you want, we can go to the cinema together tomorrow and watch a movie.
Nachdem ich meine Zähne geputzt hatte, ging ich sofort ins Bett und schlief ein.;After I had brushed my teeth, I went straight to bed and fell asleep.
Der Minister hat betont, dass Bildung die wichtigste Investition in unsere Zukunft ist.;The minister emphasized that education is the most important investment in our future.
Ich habe versucht, das Rätsel zu lösen, aber es war einfach zu schwierig für mich.;I tried to solve the puzzle, but it was simply too difficult for me.
Obwohl wir uns gestritten haben, sind wir immer noch gute Freunde geblieben.;Although we argued, we still remained good friends.
Mein Bruder hat sich entschieden, Medizin zu studieren und später Arzt zu werden.;My brother has decided to study medicine and later become a doctor.
Die Bibliothekarin hat mir geholfen, die richtigen Bücher für meine Recherche zu finden.;The librarian helped me find the right books for my research.
Wenn es morgen regnet, werden wir das Picknick auf nächste Woche verschieben müssen.;If it rains tomorrow, we will have to postpone the picnic to next week.
Nachdem wir eingekauft hatten, kochten wir zusammen ein leckeres italienisches Abendessen.;After we had shopped, we cooked a delicious Italian dinner together.
Ich habe gelesen, dass immer mehr Menschen vegetarisch oder vegan leben möchten.;I read that more and more people want to live vegetarian or vegan.
Der Ingenieur hat erklärt, wie die neue Maschine funktioniert und bedient werden muss.;The engineer explained how the new machine works and must be operated.
Obwohl ich keine Erfahrung habe, bin ich bereit, hart zu arbeiten und zu lernen.;Although I have no experience, I am ready to work hard and learn.
Meine Freunde haben vorgeschlagen, am Wochenende gemeinsam wandern zu gehen und die Natur zu genießen.;My friends suggested going hiking together on the weekend and enjoying nature.
Wenn du diese Tabletten nimmst, solltest du keinen Alkohol trinken und viel Wasser trinken.;If you take these tablets, you should not drink alcohol and drink lots of water.
Der Autor hat ein spannendes Buch über seine Reisen durch Südamerika geschrieben.;The author wrote an exciting book about his travels through South America.
Ich habe mich gewundert, warum so viele Menschen vor dem Geschäft in der Schlange standen.;I wondered why so many people were standing in line in front of the store.
Nachdem ich meinen Führerschein gemacht hatte, kaufte ich mir sofort ein gebrauchtes Auto.;After I had gotten my driver's license, I immediately bought myself a used car.
Meine Großeltern haben uns oft besucht, als sie noch gesund und mobil waren.;My grandparents often visited us when they were still healthy and mobile.
Obwohl der Test schwierig war, haben die meisten Schüler ihn erfolgreich bestanden.;Although the test was difficult, most students passed it successfully.
Der Verkäufer hat uns verschiedene Farben und Größen gezeigt und uns gut beraten.;The seller showed us different colors and sizes and advised us well.
Ich möchte gerne einen Computerkurs besuchen, um meine technischen Fähigkeiten zu verbessern.;I would like to attend a computer course to improve my technical skills.
Wenn ich im Ausland bin, vermisse ich immer meine Familie und mein Zuhause.;When I am abroad, I always miss my family and my home.
Nachdem sie die Nachricht gehört hatte, rief sie sofort ihre Mutter an.;After she had heard the news, she immediately called her mother.
Die Feuerwehr kam schnell und konnte den Brand rechtzeitig unter Kontrolle bringen.;The fire department came quickly and was able to bring the fire under control in time.
Ich habe gehört, dass diese Universität sehr gute Professoren und moderne Ausstattung hat.;I heard that this university has very good professors and modern equipment.
Obwohl ich Angst vor Hunden habe, hat mein Nachbar einen sehr freundlichen Hund.;Although I am afraid of dogs, my neighbor has a very friendly dog.
Mein Sohn hat beschlossen, nach der Schule eine Ausbildung als Elektriker zu machen.;My son has decided to do an apprenticeship as an electrician after school.
Der Gärtner hat uns gezeigt, wie man Rosen richtig pflanzt und pflegt.;The gardener showed us how to properly plant and care for roses.
Wenn du dich gesund ernähren möchtest, solltest du viel Gemüse und wenig Fett essen.;If you want to eat healthily, you should eat lots of vegetables and little fat.
Nachdem wir den Berg erreicht hatten, genossen wir die wunderschöne Aussicht auf das Tal.;After we had reached the mountain, we enjoyed the beautiful view of the valley.
Ich habe beschlossen, jeden Morgen joggen zu gehen, um fitter zu werden.;I have decided to go jogging every morning to become fitter.
Die Krankenschwester hat dem Patienten erklärt, wie er seine Medikamente einnehmen soll.;The nurse explained to the patient how he should take his medication.
Obwohl es sehr teuer war, haben wir uns entschieden, dieses hochwertige Sofa zu kaufen.;Although it was very expensive, we decided to buy this high-quality sofa.
Mein Freund hat mir erzählt, dass er nächsten Monat nach Australien auswandern wird.;My friend told me that he will emigrate to Australia next month.
Wenn ich älter bin, möchte ich in einem kleinen Haus auf dem Land leben.;When I am older, I want to live in a small house in the countryside.
Der Wissenschaftler hat eine wichtige Entdeckung gemacht, die vielen kranken Menschen helfen könnte.;The scientist made an important discovery that could help many sick people.
Nachdem wir die Prüfung bestanden hatten, feierten wir den ganzen Abend mit unseren Freunden.;After we had passed the exam, we celebrated all evening with our friends.
Ich habe vor, nächstes Jahr eine neue Sprache zu lernen und vielleicht Französisch zu wählen.;I plan to learn a new language next year and perhaps choose French.
Die Lehrerin hat den Eltern erklärt, dass ihre Kinder mehr Unterstützung zu Hause brauchen.;The teacher explained to the parents that their children need more support at home.
Obwohl ich viel Arbeit habe, versuche ich, jeden Tag etwas Sport zu treiben.;Although I have a lot of work, I try to do some sports every day.
Mein Vater hat sich über das schöne Geschenk sehr gefreut und uns herzlich gedankt.;My father was very happy about the beautiful gift and thanked us warmly.
Wenn du Probleme hast, kannst du jederzeit zu mir kommen und mit mir darüber sprechen.;If you have problems, you can always come to me and talk to me about it.
Nachdem der Regen aufgehört hatte, gingen wir spazieren und atmeten die frische Luft ein.;After the rain had stopped, we went for a walk and breathed in the fresh air.
Der Journalist hat einen kritischen Artikel über die Umweltpolitik der Regierung veröffentlicht.;The journalist published a critical article about the government's environmental policy.
Ich muss heute noch die Küche putzen und den Müll nach draußen bringen.;I still have to clean the kitchen today and take the garbage outside.
Obwohl sie sehr schüchtern ist, hat sie vor vielen Menschen eine Rede gehalten.;Although she is very shy, she gave a speech in front of many people.
Meine Cousine hat mir geholfen, meinen Lebenslauf zu schreiben und Bewerbungen zu verschicken.;My cousin helped me write my resume and send applications.
Der Bäcker hat uns empfohlen, das frische Vollkornbrot zu probieren, das sehr gesund ist.;The baker recommended that we try the fresh whole grain bread, which is very healthy.
Wenn ich mehr Geld verdienen würde, könnte ich mir ein größeres Haus leisten.;If I earned more money, I could afford a bigger house.
Nachdem ich das Interview gelesen hatte, verstand ich seine Position viel besser.;After I had read the interview, I understood his position much better.
Ich habe gehört, dass diese Stadt besonders schön im Frühling ist, wenn alles blüht.;I heard that this city is especially beautiful in spring when everything blooms.
Die Passagiere mussten lange warten, bis das Flugzeug endlich starten konnte.;The passengers had to wait a long time until the plane could finally take off.
Obwohl wir verschiedene Meinungen haben, respektieren wir einander und diskutieren friedlich.;Although we have different opinions, we respect each other and discuss peacefully.
Mein Neffe hat zum ersten Mal ein Tor geschossen und war sehr stolz darauf.;My nephew scored a goal for the first time and was very proud of it.
Wenn du früher Bescheid gesagt hättest, hätten wir dir helfen können.;If you had let us know earlier, we could have helped you.
Der Polizist hat uns erklärt, wo wir parken dürfen und wo es verboten ist.;The police officer explained to us where we may park and where it is forbidden.
Nachdem sie ihr Baby bekommen hatte, blieb sie sechs Monate zu Hause.;After she had her baby, she stayed home for six months.
Ich finde es wichtig, dass wir alle mehr auf unsere Umwelt achten und weniger Müll produzieren.;I think it is important that we all pay more attention to our environment and produce less waste.
Die Sekretärin hat alle Teilnehmer angerufen und ihnen den neuen Termin mitgeteilt.;The secretary called all participants and informed them of the new date.
Obwohl ich kein Talent für Musik habe, höre ich gerne klassische Konzerte.;Although I have no talent for music, I like to listen to classical concerts.
Mein Bruder hat mir versprochen, mir beim Umzug zu helfen und Möbel zu tragen.;My brother promised me to help me with the move and carry furniture.
Wenn das Projekt rechtzeitig fertig wird, bekommen wir einen Bonus von der Firma.;If the project is finished on time, we will get a bonus from the company.
Nachdem wir das Problem besprochen hatten, fanden wir schnell eine gute Lösung.;After we had discussed the problem, we quickly found a good solution.
Der Apotheker hat mir ein wirksames Mittel gegen Kopfschmerzen empfohlen.;The pharmacist recommended an effective remedy for headaches to me.
Ich habe mich entschieden, mehr Bücher zu lesen und weniger Zeit am Computer zu verbringen.;I have decided to read more books and spend less time on the computer.
Obwohl der Weg gefährlich war, haben die Bergsteiger den Gipfel erfolgreich erreicht.;Although the path was dangerous, the mountaineers successfully reached the summit.
Meine Nachbarin hat mir angeboten, auf meine Katze aufzupassen, während ich im Urlaub bin.;My neighbor offered to look after my cat while I am on vacation.
Der Verkehr war heute Morgen besonders schlimm wegen eines Unfalls auf der Autobahn.;The traffic was particularly bad this morning because of an accident on the highway.
Wenn ich Kinder hätte, würde ich ihnen beibringen, ehrlich und respektvoll zu sein.;If I had children, I would teach them to be honest and respectful.
Nachdem er seine Rede gehalten hatte, gab es großen Applaus vom Publikum.;After he had given his speech, there was great applause from the audience.
Ich hoffe, dass die neue Regierung die versprochenen Reformen wirklich umsetzt.;I hope that the new government really implements the promised reforms.
Die Studenten haben eine Petition unterschrieben, um gegen die Studiengebühren zu protestieren.;The students signed a petition to protest against the tuition fees.
Obwohl ich Vegetarier bin, respektiere ich Menschen, die Fleisch essen.;Although I am a vegetarian, I respect people who eat meat.
Mein Chef hat mir eine interessante Aufgabe gegeben, die meine Kreativität erfordert.;My boss gave me an interesting task that requires my creativity.
Wenn du regelmäßig übst, wirst du bald sehr gut Klavier spielen können.;If you practice regularly, you will soon be able to play the piano very well.
Der Architekt hat einen innovativen Plan für das neue Stadtzentrum entworfen.;The architect designed an innovative plan for the new city center.
Nachdem wir den Vertrag gelesen hatten, stellten wir fest, dass einige Bedingungen unklar waren.;After we had read the contract, we found that some conditions were unclear.
Ich muss daran denken, meine Pflanzen regelmäßig zu gießen, damit sie nicht vertrocknen.;I must remember to water my plants regularly so that they don't dry out.
Obwohl sie erst fünf Jahre alt ist, kann meine Nichte schon lesen und schreiben.;Although she is only five years old, my niece can already read and write.
Meine Freunde haben beschlossen, gemeinsam ein Restaurant zu eröffnen und ihr eigenes Geschäft zu führen.;My friends have decided to open a restaurant together and run their own business.
Der Verkäufer hat uns versichert, dass wir die Ware innerhalb von drei Tagen zurückgeben können.;The seller assured us that we can return the goods within three days.
Wenn ich einen Wunsch frei hätte, würde ich mir Weltfrieden wünschen.;If I had one wish, I would wish for world peace.
Nachdem ich meinen Kaffee getrunken hatte, fühlte ich mich wacher und energiegeladener.;After I had drunk my coffee, I felt more awake and energized.
Ich habe vor, mehr Zeit mit meinen Großeltern zu verbringen, solange sie noch leben.;I plan to spend more time with my grandparents while they are still alive.
Die Forscher haben herausgefunden, dass Schlaf sehr wichtig für unser Gedächtnis ist.;The researchers have found out that sleep is very important for our memory.
Obwohl das Hotel teuer war, war der Service ausgezeichnet und das Zimmer sehr komfortabel.;Although the hotel was expensive, the service was excellent and the room very comfortable.
Mein Sohn hat sich für einen Kurs angemeldet, um Programmieren zu lernen.;My son registered for a course to learn programming.
Wenn du deine Ziele erreichen möchtest, musst du hart arbeiten und nie aufgeben.;If you want to achieve your goals, you must work hard and never give up.
Der Busfahrer hat uns darüber informiert, dass die nächste Haltestelle der Hauptbahnhof ist.;The bus driver informed us that the next stop is the main train station.
Nachdem wir das Fußballspiel gesehen hatten, diskutierten wir über die Leistung der Spieler.;After we had watched the football game, we discussed the performance of the players.
Ich habe gelesen, dass diese Pflanze viel Sonnenlicht und wenig Wasser braucht.;I read that this plant needs a lot of sunlight and little water.
Die Eltern haben ihren Kindern erklärt, warum es wichtig ist, höflich zu sein.;The parents explained to their children why it is important to be polite.
Obwohl ich mich verlaufen hatte, fand ich schließlich den richtigen Weg zum Museum.;Although I had gotten lost, I finally found the right way to the museum.
Meine Schwester hat mir geraten, eine Versicherung für mein neues Auto abzuschließen.;My sister advised me to take out insurance for my new car.
Wenn ich im Lotto gewinnen würde, würde ich einen Teil des Geldes spenden.;If I won the lottery, I would donate part of the money.
Der Trainer hat die Spieler motiviert, ihr Bestes zu geben und niemals aufzugeben.;The coach motivated the players to give their best and never give up.
Nachdem ich die E-Mail verschickt hatte, bemerkte ich, dass ich einen Anhang vergessen hatte.;After I had sent the email, I noticed that I had forgotten an attachment.
Ich habe beschlossen, meine alten Kleider zu spenden, anstatt sie wegzuwerfen.;I have decided to donate my old clothes instead of throwing them away.
Obwohl er sehr beschäftigt ist, findet er immer Zeit für seine Familie.;Although he is very busy, he always finds time for his family.
Die Bibliothek hat ihre Öffnungszeiten erweitert, damit mehr Studenten sie nutzen können.;The library has extended its opening hours so that more students can use it.
Mein Vater hat mir beigebracht, dass Ehrlichkeit und Vertrauen das Wichtigste im Leben sind.;My father taught me that honesty and trust are the most important things in life.
Wenn du nach Berlin kommst, können wir uns treffen und zusammen die Stadt erkunden.;If you come to Berlin, we can meet and explore the city together.
Nachdem ich den Arzt besucht hatte, fühlte ich mich beruhigt und weniger besorgt.;After I had visited the doctor, I felt reassured and less worried.
Der Künstler hat ein beeindruckendes Gemälde geschaffen, das in der Galerie ausgestellt wird.;The artist created an impressive painting that will be exhibited in the gallery.
Ich muss heute noch meine Steuererklärung machen und alle Belege zusammensuchen.;I still have to do my tax return today and gather all the receipts.
Obwohl ich Angst vor Prüfungen habe, bereite ich mich immer gut vor.;Although I am afraid of exams, I always prepare well.
Meine Kollegin hat mir empfohlen, dieses Buch zu lesen, weil es sehr inspirierend ist.;My colleague recommended that I read this book because it is very inspiring.
Der Tierarzt hat unserem Hund eine Impfung gegeben und ihn gründlich untersucht.;The veterinarian gave our dog a vaccination and examined him thoroughly.
Wenn ich früher aufstehe, habe ich mehr Zeit für ein gesundes Frühstück.;If I get up earlier, I have more time for a healthy breakfast.
Nachdem wir die Ausstellung besucht hatten, tranken wir Kaffee in einem netten Café.;After we had visited the exhibition, we drank coffee in a nice café.
Ich habe gehört, dass dieser Film sehr emotional ist und viele Menschen zum Weinen bringt.;I heard that this film is very emotional and makes many people cry.
Die Schüler haben ein Theaterstück aufgeführt, das von den Eltern begeistert aufgenommen wurde.;The students performed a play that was enthusiastically received by the parents.
Obwohl ich keine Kocherfahrung habe, möchte ich lernen, komplizierte Gerichte zuzubereiten.;Although I have no cooking experience, I want to learn to prepare complicated dishes.
Mein Bruder hat sich einen Traum erfüllt und ist um die Welt gereist.;My brother fulfilled a dream and traveled around the world.
Wenn du dich konzentrierst, kannst du diese Aufgabe in kurzer Zeit erledigen.;If you concentrate, you can complete this task in a short time.
Der Bürgermeister hat versprochen, mehr Spielplätze für Kinder in der Stadt zu bauen.;The mayor promised to build more playgrounds for children in the city.
Nachdem ich das Problem erkannt hatte, suchte ich sofort nach einer passenden Lösung.;After I had recognized the problem, I immediately looked for a suitable solution.
Ich finde es schade, dass so wenige Menschen sich für Politik interessieren.;I think it's a shame that so few people are interested in politics.
Die Krankenschwester hat den Patienten getröstet und ihm Mut zugesprochen.;The nurse comforted the patient and gave him courage.
Obwohl ich wenig Erfahrung habe, bin ich sehr motiviert und lernbereit.;Although I have little experience, I am very motivated and willing to learn.
Mein Onkel hat ein erfolgreiches Unternehmen aufgebaut und beschäftigt viele Mitarbeiter.;My uncle built a successful company and employs many workers.
Wenn ich Zeit und Geld hätte, würde ich gerne ein Jahr lang durch Asien reisen.;If I had time and money, I would like to travel through Asia for a year.
Der Lehrer hat den Schülern erklärt, wie wichtig es ist, regelmäßig zu wiederholen.;The teacher explained to the students how important it is to review regularly.
Nachdem wir uns verabschiedet hatten, fuhren wir mit gemischten Gefühlen nach Hause.;After we had said goodbye, we drove home with mixed feelings.
Ich habe beschlossen, meine Gewohnheiten zu ändern und ein gesünderes Leben zu führen.;I have decided to change my habits and lead a healthier life.
Obwohl die Aufgabe schwierig war, haben wir sie gemeinsam erfolgreich gelöst.;Although the task was difficult, we solved it successfully together.
Die Wissenschaftler warnen davor, dass der Klimawandel ernsthafte Folgen haben wird.;The scientists warn that climate change will have serious consequences.
Meine Freundin hat sich sehr über die Überraschungsparty gefreut, die wir organisiert haben.;My girlfriend was very happy about the surprise party that we organized.
Wenn du Fragen hast, zögere nicht, mich anzurufen oder mir eine Nachricht zu schicken.;If you have questions, don't hesitate to call me or send me a message.
Der Handwerker hat versprochen, die Reparatur schnell und professionell durchzuführen.;The craftsman promised to carry out the repair quickly and professionally.
Nachdem ich die Wahrheit erfahren hatte, war ich enttäuscht und wütend zugleich.;After I had learned the truth, I was disappointed and angry at the same time.
Ich hoffe sehr, dass du deinen Traumjob findest und glücklich damit wirst.;I very much hope that you find your dream job and will be happy with it.
Die Musiker haben ein wunderbares Konzert gegeben, das alle Zuhörer begeistert hat.;The musicians gave a wonderful concert that thrilled all the listeners.
Obwohl ich viel zu tun habe, nehme ich mir immer Zeit für meine Hobbys.;Although I have a lot to do, I always make time for my hobbies.
Mein Großvater hat mir viele interessante Geschichten aus seiner Jugend erzählt.;My grandfather told me many interesting stories from his youth.
Wenn du ehrlich bist, werden die Menschen dir vertrauen und dich respektieren.;If you are honest, people will trust you and respect you.
Der Verkäufer hat uns verschiedene Optionen gezeigt und uns Zeit zum Nachdenken gegeben.;The seller showed us different options and gave us time to think.
Nachdem wir die Nachrichten gesehen hatten, sprachen wir über die aktuelle politische Situation.;After we had watched the news, we talked about the current political situation.
Ich muss daran denken, rechtzeitig einen Tisch im Restaurant zu reservieren.;I must remember to reserve a table at the restaurant in time.
Obwohl ich nicht religiös bin, respektiere ich die Überzeugungen anderer Menschen.;Although I am not religious, I respect the beliefs of other people.
Die Regierung hat neue Gesetze eingeführt, um die Wirtschaft zu stärken.;The government introduced new laws to strengthen the economy.
Meine Tochter hat sich entschieden, Psychologie zu studieren und Menschen zu helfen.;My daughter has decided to study psychology and help people.
Wenn du gesund bleiben möchtest, solltest du ausreichend schlafen und wenig Stress haben.;If you want to stay healthy, you should sleep enough and have little stress.
Der Fotograf hat wunderschöne Bilder von der Hochzeit gemacht, die uns sehr gefallen.;The photographer took beautiful pictures of the wedding that we really like.
Nachdem ich meine Arbeit beendet hatte, ging ich nach Hause und entspannte mich.;After I had finished my work, I went home and relaxed.
Ich habe vor, nächstes Jahr einen Marathon zu laufen und dafür hart zu trainieren.;I plan to run a marathon next year and train hard for it.
Die Kinder haben im Kunstunterricht kreative Bilder gemalt und waren sehr stolz darauf.;The children painted creative pictures in art class and were very proud of them.
Obwohl das Wetter schlecht war, hatten wir einen schönen Tag am Meer.;Although the weather was bad, we had a nice day at the sea.
Mein Nachbar hat mir geholfen, meinen kaputten Zaun zu reparieren und zu streichen.;My neighbor helped me repair and paint my broken fence.
Wenn ich könnte, würde ich die Zeit zurückdrehen und einige Fehler vermeiden.;If I could, I would turn back time and avoid some mistakes.
Der Anwalt hat seinem Mandanten geraten, die Wahrheit zu sagen und ehrlich zu sein.;The lawyer advised his client to tell the truth and be honest.
Nachdem sie ihre Ausbildung abgeschlossen hatte, bekam sie mehrere interessante Jobangebote.;After she had completed her training, she received several interesting job offers.
Ich finde es wichtig, dass wir alle tolerant sind und Vielfalt akzeptieren.;I think it is important that we are all tolerant and accept diversity.
Die Passagiere haben sich beschwert, dass die Fluggesellschaft ihr Gepäck verloren hat.;The passengers complained that the airline lost their luggage.
Obwohl ich keine technischen Kenntnisse habe, versuche ich, neue Programme zu lernen.;Although I have no technical knowledge, I try to learn new programs.
Mein Chef hat mich gelobt, weil ich das Projekt pünktlich und erfolgreich abgeschlossen habe.;My boss praised me because I completed the project on time and successfully.
Wenn du nach Paris fährst, musst du unbedingt den Eiffelturm und das Louvre besuchen.;If you go to Paris, you must definitely visit the Eiffel Tower and the Louvre.
Der Koch hat uns ein köstliches Menü serviert, das aus fünf verschiedenen Gängen bestand.;The chef served us a delicious menu that consisted of five different courses.
Nachdem ich die Anleitung gelesen hatte, konnte ich das Gerät problemlos installieren.;After I had read the instructions, I could install the device without problems.
Ich habe gehört, dass dieses Buch sehr spannend ist und man es nicht weglegen kann.;I heard that this book is very exciting and you cannot put it down.
Die Lehrerin hat die Klasse ermutigt, mehr Fragen zu stellen und aktiv mitzumachen.;The teacher encouraged the class to ask more questions and participate actively.
Obwohl ich müde war, konnte ich nicht einschlafen, weil ich zu viel nachgedacht habe.;Although I was tired, I could not fall asleep because I thought too much.
Mein Freund hat mir erzählt, dass er bald heiraten und eine Familie gründen wird.;My friend told me that he will soon marry and start a family.
Wenn du deine Meinung änderst, sag mir bitte sofort Bescheid.;If you change your mind, please let me know immediately.
Der Arzt hat mir empfohlen, mehr Vitamine zu nehmen und mich ausgewogen zu ernähren.;The doctor recommended that I take more vitamins and eat a balanced diet.
Nachdem wir den Plan besprochen hatten, begannen wir sofort mit der Umsetzung.;After we had discussed the plan, we immediately began with the implementation.
Ich möchte gerne wissen, ob es in dieser Stadt gute Restaurants und Cafés gibt.;I would like to know if there are good restaurants and cafés in this city.
Die Touristen haben sich über die schlechte Organisation der Führung beschwert.;The tourists complained about the poor organization of the tour.
Obwohl ich Angst vor Höhe habe, bin ich auf den Turm gestiegen und habe die Aussicht genossen.;Although I am afraid of heights, I climbed the tower and enjoyed the view.
Meine Mutter hat mir beigebracht, immer dankbar zu sein für das, was ich habe.;My mother taught me to always be grateful for what I have.
Wenn es dir nicht gut geht, solltest du zum Arzt gehen und dich untersuchen lassen.;If you don't feel well, you should go to the doctor and get examined.
Der Geschäftsführer hat angekündigt, dass die Firma expandieren und neue Märkte erschließen wird.;The managing director announced that the company will expand and open up new markets.
Nachdem ich den Schlüssel verloren hatte, musste ich einen Schlüsseldienst rufen.;After I had lost the key, I had to call a locksmith.
Ich habe beschlossen, öfter mit dem Fahrrad zu fahren und weniger das Auto zu benutzen.;I have decided to ride my bike more often and use the car less.
Obwohl wir unterschiedliche Charaktere haben, verstehen wir uns sehr gut.;Although we have different characters, we get along very well.
Die Schüler haben eine Klassenfahrt nach Rom gemacht und viele Sehenswürdigkeiten besichtigt.;The students took a class trip to Rome and visited many sights.
Mein Cousin hat sich einen neuen Laptop gekauft, weil sein alter zu langsam geworden war.;My cousin bought himself a new laptop because his old one had become too slow.
Wenn du Erfolg haben möchtest, musst du diszipliniert sein und an dir arbeiten.;If you want to be successful, you must be disciplined and work on yourself.
Der Direktor hat alle Mitarbeiter zu einer wichtigen Besprechung eingeladen.;The director invited all employees to an important meeting.
Nachdem wir das Theater verlassen hatten, gingen wir noch in eine Bar.;After we had left the theater, we went to a bar.
Ich finde es beeindruckend, wie viel diese junge Frau schon erreicht hat.;I find it impressive how much this young woman has already achieved.
Die Polizei hat den Täter gefasst und vor Gericht gestellt.;The police caught the perpetrator and brought him to court.
Obwohl ich kein Geld habe, bin ich glücklich und zufrieden mit meinem Leben.;Although I have no money, I am happy and satisfied with my life.
Meine Schwester hat sich über die Beförderung sehr gefreut und war sehr stolz.;My sister was very happy about the promotion and was very proud.
Wenn du möchtest, kann ich dir helfen, deine Bewerbung zu verbessern.;If you want, I can help you improve your application.
Der Zahnarzt hat mir erklärt, dass ich eine Füllung brauche und einen Termin vereinbart.;The dentist explained to me that I need a filling and made an appointment.
Nachdem ich das Konzert besucht hatte, konnte ich tagelang die Melodie nicht vergessen.;After I had attended the concert, I could not forget the melody for days.
Ich hoffe, dass wir uns bald wiedersehen und wieder viel Zeit miteinander verbringen können.;I hope that we will see each other again soon and can spend a lot of time together.
Die Firma hat beschlossen, in erneuerbare Energien zu investieren und umweltfreundlicher zu werden.;The company decided to invest in renewable energies and become more environmentally friendly.
Obwohl ich keine Ahnung von Technik habe, habe ich versucht, den Computer selbst zu reparieren.;Although I have no idea about technology, I tried to repair the computer myself.
Mein Vater hat mir geraten, immer einen Notgroschen zu haben für schwierige Zeiten.;My father advised me to always have an emergency fund for difficult times.
Wenn du dich anstrengst, kannst du alles erreichen, was du dir vorgenommen hast.;If you make an effort, you can achieve everything you have set out to do.
Der Lehrer hat die Schüler ermutigt, ihre eigene Meinung zu äußern und kritisch zu denken.;The teacher encouraged the students to express their own opinion and think critically.
Nachdem wir uns lange nicht gesehen hatten, umarmten wir uns herzlich und freuten uns sehr.;After we had not seen each other for a long time, we hugged each other warmly and were very happy.
Ich habe gelesen, dass regelmäßiges Lesen gut für das Gehirn ist und die Konzentration verbessert.;I read that regular reading is good for the brain and improves concentration.
Die Nachbarn haben uns eingeladen, an ihrem Gartenfest teilzunehmen und zu feiern.;The neighbors invited us to participate in their garden party and celebrate.
Obwohl ich Angst vor Spinnen habe, habe ich versucht, ruhig zu bleiben.;Although I am afraid of spiders, I tried to stay calm.
Mein Bruder hat sich ein neues Hobby gesucht und spielt jetzt regelmäßig Tennis.;My brother found himself a new hobby and now plays tennis regularly.
Wenn du mehr verdienen möchtest, solltest du dich weiterbilden und neue Fähigkeiten erlernen.;If you want to earn more, you should continue your education and learn new skills.
Der Architekt hat ein modernes Gebäude entworfen, das viel Aufmerksamkeit erregt hat.;The architect designed a modern building that has attracted a lot of attention.
Nachdem ich die Rechnung bezahlt hatte, verließ ich das Restaurant und ging nach Hause.;After I had paid the bill, I left the restaurant and went home.
Ich finde es schön, dass so viele Menschen ehrenamtlich arbeiten und anderen helfen.;I think it's nice that so many people volunteer and help others.
Die Studenten haben eine Demonstration organisiert, um für bessere Studienbedingungen zu kämpfen.;The students organized a demonstration to fight for better study conditions.
Obwohl ich nicht perfekt bin, versuche ich jeden Tag, ein besserer Mensch zu werden.;Although I am not perfect, I try every day to become a better person.
Meine Tante hat mir erzählt, dass sie in ihrer Jugend viel gereist ist.;My aunt told me that she traveled a lot in her youth.
Wenn du dich einsam fühlst, kannst du mich jederzeit anrufen und wir reden.;If you feel lonely, you can call me anytime and we'll talk.
Der Wissenschaftler hat eine neue Theorie entwickelt, die viele Fragen beantwortet.;The scientist developed a new theory that answers many questions.
Nachdem wir die Stadt erkundet hatten, waren wir erschöpft aber glücklich.;After we had explored the city, we were exhausted but happy.
Ich habe vor, mehr Sport zu treiben und meine Ernährung umzustellen.;I plan to exercise more and change my diet.
Die Kinder haben einen Schneemann gebaut und waren begeistert von dem vielen Schnee.;The children built a snowman and were thrilled by all the snow.
Obwohl ich skeptisch war, habe ich das neue Restaurant ausprobiert und war positiv überrascht.;Although I was skeptical, I tried the new restaurant and was pleasantly surprised.
Mein Kollege hat mir geholfen, eine wichtige Präsentation vorzubereiten und zu üben.;My colleague helped me prepare and practice an important presentation.
Wenn du einen Fehler machst, ist es wichtig, ihn zuzugeben und daraus zu lernen.;If you make a mistake, it is important to admit it and learn from it.
Der Künstler hat eine Ausstellung eröffnet, die großes Interesse in der Öffentlichkeit geweckt hat.;The artist opened an exhibition that generated great public interest.
Nachdem ich die Prüfung nicht bestanden hatte, war ich enttäuscht aber nicht entmutigt.;After I had not passed the exam, I was disappointed but not discouraged.
Ich hoffe, dass die Zukunft viele positive Veränderungen für uns alle bringen wird.;I hope that the future will bring many positive changes for all of us.
Der Psychologe empfahl mir, ein Tagebuch zu führen und meine Gedanken regelmäßig aufzuschreiben.;The psychologist recommended that I keep a diary and write down my thoughts regularly.
Die Gewerkschaft fordert höhere Löhne und bessere Arbeitsbedingungen für alle Angestellten im Betrieb.;The union demands higher wages and better working conditions for all employees in the company.
Nachdem die Verhandlungen gescheitert waren, mussten beide Parteien einen Kompromiss finden.;After the negotiations had failed, both parties had to find a compromise.
Ich bewundere Menschen, die trotz großer Hindernisse ihre Träume verwirklichen und niemals aufgeben.;I admire people who realize their dreams despite great obstacles and never give up.
Obwohl die Inflation steigt, weigert sich die Zentralbank, die Zinssätze zu erhöhen.;Although inflation is rising, the central bank refuses to raise interest rates.
Der Philosoph stellte die These auf, dass Glück nicht vom Reichtum abhängt.;The philosopher put forward the thesis that happiness does not depend on wealth.
Wenn ich die Wahl hätte, würde ich lieber in einer Kleinstadt als in einer Großstadt wohnen.;If I had the choice, I would rather live in a small town than in a big city.
Die Schauspielerin erhielt einen renommierten Preis für ihre beeindruckende Darstellung der Hauptrolle.;The actress received a prestigious award for her impressive portrayal of the main role.
Der Psychologe empfahl mir, regelmäßig ein Tagebuch zu führen.;The psychologist recommended that I keep a diary regularly.
Die Gewerkschaft fordert höhere Löhne für alle Angestellten im Betrieb.;The union demands higher wages for all employees in the company.
Nachdem die Verhandlungen gescheitert waren, suchten sie einen Kompromiss.;After the negotiations had failed, they sought a compromise.
Ich bewundere Menschen, die ihre Träume trotz Hindernissen verwirklichen.;I admire people who realize their dreams despite obstacles.
Obwohl die Inflation steigt, bleiben die Zinssätze unverändert niedrig.;Although inflation is rising, interest rates remain unchanged low.
Der Philosoph behauptete, dass Glück nicht von Reichtum abhängt.;The philosopher claimed that happiness does not depend on wealth.
Die Schauspielerin erhielt einen Preis für ihre beeindruckende Darstellung.;The actress received an award for her impressive portrayal.
Der Skandal wurde publik und der Minister musste zurücktreten.;The scandal became public and the minister had to resign.
Mein Nachbar züchtet Bienen und verkauft den Honig auf dem Markt.;My neighbor breeds bees and sells the honey at the market.
Wenn ich könnte, würde ich öfter ehrenamtlich in Projekten mitarbeiten.;If I could, I would volunteer more often in projects.
Die Abgeordneten debattierten stundenlang über die neue Gesetzesvorlage im Parlament.;The delegates debated for hours about the new bill in parliament.
Nachdem ich mein Diplom erhalten hatte, bewarb ich mich bei internationalen Firmen.;After I had received my diploma, I applied to international companies.
Der Journalist recherchierte monatelang für seinen kritischen Artikel über Korruption.;The journalist researched for months for his critical article about corruption.
Ich schätze es sehr, wenn Menschen pünktlich und zuverlässig sind.;I appreciate it very much when people are punctual and reliable.
Obwohl er talentiert ist, fehlt ihm die nötige Disziplin zum Erfolg.;Although he is talented, he lacks the necessary discipline for success.
Die Klimaaktivisten organisierten eine Demonstration gegen die geplante Kohlegrube.;The climate activists organized a demonstration against the planned coal mine.
Meine Cousine studiert Archäologie und erforscht antike Zivilisationen in Griechenland.;My cousin studies archaeology and researches ancient civilizations in Greece.
Wenn du investieren möchtest, solltest du vorher die Risiken gründlich analysieren.;If you want to invest, you should thoroughly analyze the risks beforehand.
Der Chirurg operierte den Patienten erfolgreich und rettete ihm das Leben.;The surgeon operated on the patient successfully and saved his life.
Nachdem die Frist abgelaufen war, konnten wir den Antrag nicht mehr einreichen.;After the deadline had expired, we could no longer submit the application.
Ich strebe danach, meine beruflichen Fähigkeiten kontinuierlich zu erweitern und verbessern.;I strive to continuously expand and improve my professional skills.
Die Demonstranten protestierten friedlich gegen die Kürzungen im Bildungssystem.;The demonstrators protested peacefully against the cuts in the education system.
Obwohl ich Zweifel hatte, entschied ich mich letztendlich für diese Option.;Although I had doubts, I ultimately decided on this option.
Der Komponist schuf ein beeindruckendes Werk, das international Anerkennung fand.;The composer created an impressive work that found international recognition.
Mein Kollege pendelt täglich zwei Stunden zur Arbeit und wieder zurück.;My colleague commutes two hours to work daily and back again.
Wenn man jung ist, unterschätzt man oft den Wert der Gesundheit.;When one is young, one often underestimates the value of health.
Die Forscherin entdeckte eine seltene Pflanzenart im tropischen Regenwald Brasiliens.;The researcher discovered a rare plant species in the tropical rainforest of Brazil.
Nachdem ich den Vertrag sorgfältig gelesen hatte, unterschrieb ich ihn zögernd.;After I had read the contract carefully, I signed it hesitantly.
Ich bevorzuge authentische Restaurants gegenüber den üblichen Touristenfallen in Städten.;I prefer authentic restaurants over the usual tourist traps in cities.
Der Richter verurteilte den Angeklagten wegen Betrugs zu drei Jahren Haft.;The judge sentenced the defendant to three years in prison for fraud.
Obwohl wir verschieden sind, teilen wir dieselben grundlegenden Werte und Überzeugungen.;Although we are different, we share the same basic values and convictions.
Die Ökonomin prognostiziert eine Rezession für das kommende Wirtschaftsjahr.;The economist predicts a recession for the coming fiscal year.
Meine Nichte übt täglich Geige und träumt von einer Karriere als Musikerin.;My niece practices violin daily and dreams of a career as a musician.
Wenn du abnehmen möchtest, musst du deine Kalorienzufuhr reduzieren und trainieren.;If you want to lose weight, you must reduce your calorie intake and train.
Der Anwalt plädierte leidenschaftlich für die Unschuld seines Mandanten vor Gericht.;The lawyer pleaded passionately for his client's innocence in court.
Nachdem das Unternehmen fusioniert hatte, wurden viele Arbeitsplätze leider abgebaut.;After the company had merged, many jobs were unfortunately eliminated.
Ich respektiere Menschen, die zu ihren Fehlern stehen und Verantwortung übernehmen.;I respect people who admit their mistakes and take responsibility.
Die Aktivistin kämpft seit Jahren für die Rechte benachteiligter Minderheiten.;The activist has been fighting for the rights of disadvantaged minorities for years.
Obwohl der Lärm störte, konzentrierte ich mich auf meine Arbeit.;Although the noise disturbed me, I concentrated on my work.
Der Biologe erforscht das Verhalten von Delfinen im natürlichen Lebensraum.;The biologist researches the behavior of dolphins in their natural habitat.
Mein Bruder absolviert ein Praktikum bei einer renommierten Werbeagentur in München.;My brother is doing an internship at a prestigious advertising agency in Munich.
Wenn die Wirtschaft wächst, profitieren idealerweise alle Bevölkerungsschichten davon.;When the economy grows, ideally all population groups benefit from it.
Die Soziologin analysiert die Auswirkungen der Digitalisierung auf soziale Strukturen.;The sociologist analyzes the effects of digitalization on social structures.
Nachdem ich mehrere Angebote verglichen hatte, wählte ich das günstigste aus.;After I had compared several offers, I chose the cheapest one.
Ich finde es bedauerlich, dass so wenige junge Menschen wählen gehen.;I find it regrettable that so few young people go to vote.
Der Gärtner pflanzte verschiedene Kräuter und Gemüsesorten in seinem Gewächshaus an.;The gardener planted various herbs and vegetables in his greenhouse.
Obwohl sie schüchtern wirkt, vertritt sie ihre Meinung stets selbstbewusst.;Although she seems shy, she always represents her opinion confidently.
Die Historikerin schrieb eine Dissertation über die Französische Revolution.;The historian wrote a dissertation about the French Revolution.
Mein Onkel eröffnete eine Bäckerei und backt traditionelles Brot nach alten Rezepten.;My uncle opened a bakery and bakes traditional bread according to old recipes.
Wenn du kritisiert wirst, solltest du konstruktive Kritik von Beleidigungen unterscheiden.;If you are criticized, you should distinguish constructive criticism from insults.
Der Unternehmer gründete ein Start-up im Bereich erneuerbarer Energien.;The entrepreneur founded a start-up in the field of renewable energies.
Nachdem sie befördert worden war, übernahm sie mehr Verantwortung im Unternehmen.;After she had been promoted, she took on more responsibility in the company.
Ich genieße es, am Wochenende durch die Natur zu wandern und abzuschalten.;I enjoy hiking through nature on weekends and switching off.
Die Philosophin hinterfragt die moralischen Grundlagen unserer modernen Gesellschaft kritisch.;The philosopher critically questions the moral foundations of our modern society.
Obwohl ich skeptisch war, stellte sich die Theorie als richtig heraus.;Although I was skeptical, the theory turned out to be correct.
Der Automechaniker diagnostizierte einen Defekt am Getriebe meines alten Wagens.;The car mechanic diagnosed a defect in the transmission of my old car.
Meine Freundin engagiert sich ehrenamtlich in einer Organisation für Obdachlose.;My girlfriend volunteers in an organization for homeless people.
Wenn man Verantwortung trägt, muss man auch schwierige Entscheidungen treffen können.;When one bears responsibility, one must also be able to make difficult decisions.
Der Sozialarbeiter betreut Jugendliche aus schwierigen familiären Verhältnissen.;The social worker supervises young people from difficult family circumstances.
Nachdem ich die Symptome beschrieben hatte, verschrieb mir der Arzt Antibiotika.;After I had described the symptoms, the doctor prescribed me antibiotics.
Ich strebe eine ausgewogene Balance zwischen Berufs- und Privatleben an.;I strive for a balanced balance between professional and private life.
Die Ingenieurin entwickelte ein innovatives System zur effizienteren Energiegewinnung.;The engineer developed an innovative system for more efficient energy production.
Obwohl die Mieten steigen, ziehen immer mehr Menschen in die Großstädte.;Although rents are rising, more and more people are moving to big cities.
Der Psychotherapeut behandelt Patienten mit Angststörungen und traumatischen Erfahrungen.;The psychotherapist treats patients with anxiety disorders and traumatic experiences.
Mein Cousin spezialisiert sich auf künstliche Intelligenz und maschinelles Lernen.;My cousin specializes in artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Wenn Konflikte entstehen, ist offene Kommunikation der Schlüssel zur Lösung.;When conflicts arise, open communication is the key to the solution.
Die Übersetzerin beherrscht sechs Sprachen fließend und arbeitet für internationale Organisationen.;The translator speaks six languages fluently and works for international organizations.
Nachdem der Strom ausgefallen war, mussten wir Kerzen anzünden.;After the power had gone out, we had to light candles.
Ich schätze Menschen, die authentisch bleiben und sich nicht verstellen müssen.;I appreciate people who remain authentic and don't have to pretend.
Der Architekt entwarf ein nachhaltiges Gebäude mit Solaranlagen auf dem Dach.;The architect designed a sustainable building with solar panels on the roof.
Obwohl ich erschöpft bin, muss ich diese Aufgabe heute noch erledigen.;Although I am exhausted, I still have to complete this task today.
Die Politikerin setzt sich für Gleichberechtigung und soziale Gerechtigkeit ein.;The politician advocates for equal rights and social justice.
Mein Vater investiert regelmäßig in Aktien und beobachtet die Börse täglich.;My father invests regularly in stocks and observes the stock market daily.
Wenn die Demokratie gefährdet ist, müssen Bürger ihre Rechte aktiv verteidigen.;When democracy is endangered, citizens must actively defend their rights.
Der Ernährungsberater empfahl mir, mehr Ballaststoffe und weniger Zucker zu konsumieren.;The nutritionist recommended that I consume more fiber and less sugar.
Nachdem ich die Stellenanzeige gelesen hatte, schickte ich sofort meine Bewerbungsunterlagen.;After I had read the job advertisement, I immediately sent my application documents.
Ich bedauere es, dass wir unsere Umwelt so rücksichtslos verschmutzen.;I regret that we pollute our environment so recklessly.
Die Tierärztin behandelt sowohl Haustiere als auch exotische Tiere aus dem Zoo.;The veterinarian treats both pets and exotic animals from the zoo.
Obwohl ich Vorurteile hatte, wurde ich eines Besseren belehrt.;Although I had prejudices, I was taught better.
Der Banker analysiert täglich Markttrends und berät vermögende Kunden.;The banker analyzes market trends daily and advises wealthy clients.
Meine Schwägerin leitet eine gemeinnützige Stiftung für benachteiligte Kinder.;My sister-in-law runs a charitable foundation for disadvantaged children.
Wenn man Vorbilder hat, orientiert man sich oft an ihren Werten.;When one has role models, one often orients oneself to their values.
Der Meteorologe warnt vor einem schweren Unwetter am kommenden Wochenende.;The meteorologist warns of a severe storm on the coming weekend.
Nachdem ich den Artikel publiziert hatte, erhielt ich viel positives Feedback.;After I had published the article, I received a lot of positive feedback.
Ich befürworte strengere Gesetze zum Schutz gefährdeter Tierarten weltweit.;I support stricter laws to protect endangered animal species worldwide.
Die Designerin kreierte eine innovative Kollektion aus recycelten Materialien.;The designer created an innovative collection from recycled materials.
Obwohl die Statistiken beunruhigend sind, ignorieren viele die wissenschaftlichen Erkenntnisse.;Although the statistics are alarming, many ignore the scientific findings.
Der Therapeut verwendet verschiedene Methoden, um seinen Patienten zu helfen.;The therapist uses different methods to help his patients.
Mein Neffe programmiert Computerspiele und verdient damit bereits gutes Geld.;My nephew programs computer games and already earns good money with it.
Wenn Traditionen starr bleiben, können sie gesellschaftlichen Fortschritt behindern.;When traditions remain rigid, they can hinder social progress.
Die Journalistin deckte einen Korruptionsskandal in der Regierung auf.;The journalist uncovered a corruption scandal in the government.
Nachdem die Beweise vorgelegt wurden, gestand der Verdächtige seine Tat.;After the evidence was presented, the suspect confessed his deed.
Ich missbillige jede Form von Diskriminierung aufgrund ethnischer Herkunft.;I disapprove of any form of discrimination based on ethnic origin.
Der Umweltschützer kämpft gegen die Abholzung des Regenwaldes in Brasilien.;The environmentalist fights against the deforestation of the rainforest in Brazil.
Obwohl ich konservativ erzogen wurde, habe ich progressive Ansichten entwickelt.;Although I was raised conservatively, I have developed progressive views.
Die Rechtsanwältin spezialisiert sich auf Fälle von häuslicher Gewalt.;The lawyer specializes in cases of domestic violence.
Mein Schwager betreibt eine erfolgreiche Import-Export-Firma für Bio-Produkte.;My brother-in-law runs a successful import-export company for organic products.
Wenn Ungleichheit zunimmt, destabilisiert das langfristig die gesamte Gesellschaft.;When inequality increases, it destabilizes the entire society in the long term.
Der Ökonom kritisiert die neoliberale Wirtschaftspolitik der aktuellen Regierung scharf.;The economist sharply criticizes the neoliberal economic policy of the current government.
Nachdem ich mich informiert hatte, änderte ich meine ursprüngliche Meinung komplett.;After I had informed myself, I completely changed my original opinion.
Ich unterstütze Initiativen, die sich für nachhaltige Landwirtschaft einsetzen.;I support initiatives that advocate for sustainable agriculture.
Die Pflegerin kümmert sich liebevoll um ältere Menschen im Seniorenheim.;The nurse cares lovingly for elderly people in the nursing home.
Obwohl ich privilegiert bin, versuche ich sozial benachteiligte Menschen zu unterstützen.;Although I am privileged, I try to support socially disadvantaged people.
Der Physiker forscht an neuen Methoden zur Speicherung erneuerbarer Energien.;The physicist researches new methods for storing renewable energies.
Meine Tante züchtet seltene Orchideen und verkauft sie an Sammler.;My aunt breeds rare orchids and sells them to collectors.
Wenn Korruption toleriert wird, untergraben wir das Vertrauen in Institutionen.;When corruption is tolerated, we undermine trust in institutions.
Der Diplomat verhandelt über ein komplexes Handelsabkommen zwischen verschiedenen Ländern.;The diplomat negotiates a complex trade agreement between different countries.
Nachdem ich ausgewandert war, vermisste ich meine Heimat sehr.;After I had emigrated, I missed my homeland very much.
Ich lehne Gewalt als Mittel zur Konfliktlösung kategorisch ab.;I categorically reject violence as a means of conflict resolution.
Die Chemikerin entwickelt umweltfreundliche Alternativen zu herkömmlichen Kunststoffen.;The chemist develops environmentally friendly alternatives to conventional plastics.
Obwohl ich individualistisch denke, erkenne ich den Wert von Gemeinschaft an.;Although I think individualistically, I recognize the value of community.
Der Verleger brachte ein kontroverses Buch über politische Korruption heraus.;The publisher brought out a controversial book about political corruption.
Mein Kollege vermittelt zwischen streitenden Parteien und sucht Kompromisslösungen.;My colleague mediates between quarreling parties and seeks compromise solutions.
Wenn Medien manipuliert werden, gefährdet das die Meinungsfreiheit erheblich.;When media are manipulated, it considerably endangers freedom of opinion.
Der Anthropologe studiert indigene Kulturen in entlegenen Regionen Südamerikas.;The anthropologist studies indigenous cultures in remote regions of South America.
Nachdem ich die Fakten überprüft hatte, stellte sich die Behauptung als falsch heraus.;After I had verified the facts, the claim turned out to be false.
Ich fordere mehr Transparenz in der Politik und bei öffentlichen Ausgaben.;I demand more transparency in politics and in public spending.
Die Ärztin klärt Patienten umfassend über Risiken und Nebenwirkungen auf.;The doctor comprehensively informs patients about risks and side effects.
Obwohl ich materiell bescheiden lebe, fühle ich mich geistig reich.;Although I live materially modestly, I feel spiritually rich.
Der Meteorologe erstellt präzise Wettervorhersagen mithilfe modernster Technologie.;The meteorologist creates precise weather forecasts using the most modern technology.
Mein Bruder dokumentiert soziale Ungerechtigkeiten in Entwicklungsländern fotografisch.;My brother photographically documents social injustices in developing countries.
Wenn Bildung privatisiert wird, vergrößern sich die sozialen Unterschiede dramatisch.;When education is privatized, social differences increase dramatically.
Der Soziologe untersucht die Auswirkungen von Arbeitslosigkeit auf Familien.;The sociologist examines the effects of unemployment on families.
Nachdem ich pensioniert wurde, widme ich mich gemeinnützigen Projekten.;After I was retired, I dedicate myself to charitable projects.
Ich plädiere für strengere Kontrollen bei der Lebensmittelproduktion.;I advocate for stricter controls in food production.
Die Astronomin entdeckte einen bisher unbekannten Planeten außerhalb unseres Sonnensystems.;The astronomer discovered a previously unknown planet outside our solar system.
Obwohl ich idealistisch bin, bleibe ich pragmatisch bei konkreten Entscheidungen.;Although I am idealistic, I remain pragmatic with concrete decisions.
Der Handwerker restauriert antike Möbel mit traditionellen Techniken und viel Geduld.;The craftsman restores antique furniture with traditional techniques and much patience.
Meine Cousine koordiniert internationale Hilfsprojekte in Krisengebieten.;My cousin coordinates international aid projects in crisis areas.
Wenn Ressourcen knapp werden, müssen wir unseren Konsum überdenken.;When resources become scarce, we must reconsider our consumption.
Der Ethnologe erforscht die kulturelle Vielfalt verschiedener Gesellschaften weltweit.;The ethnologist researches the cultural diversity of different societies worldwide.
Nachdem ich Zeuge des Unfalls wurde, informierte ich sofort die Polizei.;After I became a witness to the accident, I immediately informed the police.
Ich kritisiere die mangelnde Bereitschaft, in Bildung zu investieren.;I criticize the lack of willingness to invest in education.
Die Geologin analysiert Gesteinsproben, um Erdbebenrisiken besser einschätzen zu können.;The geologist analyzes rock samples to better assess earthquake risks.
Obwohl ich Fehler mache, lerne ich kontinuierlich aus meinen Erfahrungen.;Although I make mistakes, I continuously learn from my experiences.
Der Schriftsteller veröffentlichte einen provokanten Roman über gesellschaftliche Tabus.;The writer published a provocative novel about social taboos.
Mein Vetter organisiert Protestaktionen gegen die geplante Autobahn durch Naturschutzgebiete.;My cousin organizes protest actions against the planned highway through nature reserves.
Wenn Meinungsvielfalt unterdrückt wird, stirbt die Demokratie langsam.;When diversity of opinion is suppressed, democracy slowly dies.
Der Biochemiker forscht an neuen Medikamenten gegen seltene Krankheiten.;The biochemist researches new medications against rare diseases.
Nachdem ich das Stipendium erhalten hatte, konnte ich mein Studium fortsetzen.;After I had received the scholarship, I could continue my studies.
Ich verurteile die Ausbeutung von Arbeitskräften in der Textilindustrie.;I condemn the exploitation of workers in the textile industry.
Die Archäologin grub römische Artefakte aus und katalogisierte sie sorgfältig.;The archaeologist excavated Roman artifacts and catalogued them carefully.
Obwohl ich müde bin, bleibe ich optimistisch bezüglich der Zukunft.;Although I am tired, I remain optimistic regarding the future.
Der Sozialarbeiter vermittelt obdachlosen Menschen Unterkünfte und medizinische Versorgung.;The social worker provides homeless people with accommodation and medical care.
Meine Schwester kämpft gegen Vorurteile und setzt sich für Toleranz ein.;My sister fights against prejudices and advocates for tolerance.
Wenn Monopole entstehen, leiden Verbraucher unter mangelndem Wettbewerb.;When monopolies arise, consumers suffer from lack of competition.
Der Zoologe beobachtet das Paarungsverhalten bedrohter Vogelarten im Naturreservat.;The zoologist observes the mating behavior of endangered bird species in the nature reserve.
Nachdem ich die Ergebnisse ausgewertet hatte, präsentierte ich meine Erkenntnisse.;After I had evaluated the results, I presented my findings.
Ich befürchte, dass der Klimawandel irreversible Schäden verursachen wird.;I fear that climate change will cause irreversible damage.
Die Künstlerin drückt gesellschaftliche Konflikte durch ihre provokanten Installationen aus.;The artist expresses social conflicts through her provocative installations.
Obwohl ich Zweifel hege, gebe ich den Menschen Vertrauen.;Although I harbor doubts, I give people trust.
Der Lobbyist beeinflusst politische Entscheidungen zugunsten bestimmter Wirtschaftsinteressen.;The lobbyist influences political decisions in favor of certain economic interests.
Mein Neffe unterrichtet benachteiligte Jugendliche ehrenamtlich in Mathematik.;My nephew teaches disadvantaged young people mathematics as a volunteer.
Wenn Populisten Emotionen manipulieren, gefährden sie die rationale Debatte.;When populists manipulate emotions, they endanger rational debate.
Der Virologe entwickelt Impfstoffe gegen neuartige Krankheitserreger im Labor.;The virologist develops vaccines against novel pathogens in the laboratory.
Nachdem ich die Konsequenzen bedacht hatte, traf ich eine bewusste Entscheidung.;After I had considered the consequences, I made a conscious decision.
Ich hinterfrage Autoritäten kritisch, anstatt blind zu gehorchen.;I question authorities critically instead of blindly obeying.
Die Menschenrechtsaktivistin prangert Menschenrechtsverletzungen in autoritären Regimen an.;The human rights activist denounces human rights violations in authoritarian regimes.
Obwohl ich widerspreche, respektiere ich abweichende Meinungen anderer Menschen.;Although I disagree, I respect differing opinions of other people.
Der Analytiker prognostiziert wirtschaftliche Trends basierend auf statistischen Daten.;The analyst predicts economic trends based on statistical data.
Meine Tante mobilisiert Freiwillige für Umweltschutzprojekte in der Region.;My aunt mobilizes volunteers for environmental protection projects in the region.
Wenn Propaganda verbreitet wird, müssen Bürger Informationen kritisch hinterfragen.;When propaganda is spread, citizens must critically question information.
Der Neurowissenschaftler untersucht die Funktionsweise des menschlichen Gehirns.;The neuroscientist investigates the functioning of the human brain.
Nachdem ich reflektiert hatte, erkannte ich meine eigenen Vorurteile.;After I had reflected, I recognized my own prejudices.
Ich appelliere an die Vernunft und nicht an Emotionen.;I appeal to reason and not to emotions.
Die Stadträtin initiierte ein Programm zur Reduzierung von Luftverschmutzung.;The city councillor initiated a program to reduce air pollution.
Obwohl ich frustriert bin, gebe ich meine Überzeugungen nicht auf.;Although I am frustrated, I do not give up my convictions.
Der Ozeanograph erforscht die Auswirkungen von Plastikmüll auf marine Ökosysteme.;The oceanographer researches the effects of plastic waste on marine ecosystems.
Mein Cousin mobilisiert junge Wähler durch soziale Medien für Wahlen.;My cousin mobilizes young voters through social media for elections.
Wenn Zensur praktiziert wird, erstickt sie kreative und kritische Stimmen.;When censorship is practiced, it stifles creative and critical voices.
Der Ökologe warnt vor dem drastischen Rückgang der Biodiversität weltweit.;The ecologist warns of the drastic decline in biodiversity worldwide.
Nachdem ich diverse Perspektiven gehört hatte, bildete ich mir eine Meinung.;After I had heard diverse perspectives, I formed an opinion.
Ich fordere Rechenschaftspflicht von politischen Führungspersonen ein.;I demand accountability from political leaders.
Die Aktivistin organisiert Kampagnen gegen Kinderarbeit in Entwicklungsländern.;The activist organizes campaigns against child labor in developing countries.
Obwohl ich desillusioniert bin, kämpfe ich weiterhin für Veränderung.;Although I am disillusioned, I continue to fight for change.
Der Stadtplaner entwirft nachhaltige Konzepte für zukünftige urbane Entwicklungen.;The urban planner designs sustainable concepts for future urban developments.
Meine Schwägerin recherchiert investigativ über Steuerhinterziehung multinationaler Konzerne.;My sister-in-law investigates investigatively about tax evasion of multinational corporations.
Wenn Hetze toleriert wird, eskaliert die gesellschaftliche Polarisierung rapide.;When hate speech is tolerated, social polarization escalates rapidly.
Der Paläontologe rekonstruiert prähistorische Lebensformen anhand fossiler Überreste.;The paleontologist reconstructs prehistoric life forms based on fossil remains.
Nachdem ich den Kontext verstanden hatte, änderte sich meine Interpretation.;After I had understood the context, my interpretation changed.
Ich wehre mich gegen die Instrumentalisierung von Angst.;I defend myself against the instrumentalization of fear.
Die Dokumentarfilmerin enthüllt Missstände in der Massentierhaltung schonungslos.;The documentary filmmaker ruthlessly reveals abuses in factory farming.
Obwohl ich resignieren könnte, entscheide ich mich für Widerstand.;Although I could resign, I choose resistance.
Der Historiker dekonstruiert nationalistische Mythen durch sorgfältige Quellenanalyse.;The historian deconstructs nationalist myths through careful source analysis.
Mein Bruder initiiert Dialoge zwischen verfeindeten Gemeinschaften.;My brother initiates dialogues between hostile communities.
Wenn Desinformation kursiert, erodiert das Vertrauen in Institutionen.;When disinformation circulates, trust in institutions erodes.
Der Epidemiologe modelliert die Ausbreitung ansteckender Krankheiten mathematisch.;The epidemiologist mathematically models the spread of infectious diseases.
Nachdem ich Empathie entwickelt hatte, verstand ich ihre Beweggründe besser.;After I had developed empathy, I understood their motives better.
Ich konfrontiere unbequeme Wahrheiten, anstatt sie zu verdrängen.;I confront uncomfortable truths instead of repressing them.
Die Philosophin dekonstruiert die Machtstrukturen in modernen Gesellschaften analytisch.;The philosopher analytically deconstructs the power structures in modern societies.
Obwohl ich marginalisiert werde, erhebe ich meine Stimme.;Although I am marginalized, I raise my voice.
Der Kriminologe analysiert Ursachen von Jugendkriminalität in benachteiligten Stadtvierteln.;The criminologist analyzes causes of juvenile delinquency in disadvantaged neighborhoods.
Meine Cousine dokumentiert Menschenrechtsverletzungen systematisch für internationale Organisationen.;My cousin systematically documents human rights violations for international organizations.
Wenn Solidarität schwindet, fragmentiert die Gesellschaft in konkurrierende Gruppen.;When solidarity dwindles, society fragments into competing groups.
Der Verfassungsrechtler verteidigt grundlegende Freiheitsrechte gegen staatliche Übergriffe.;The constitutional lawyer defends fundamental freedoms against government encroachments.
Nachdem ich mich positioniert hatte, musste ich Konsequenzen akzeptieren.;After I had positioned myself, I had to accept consequences.
Ich opponiere gegen die Kommerzialisierung sämtlicher Lebensbereiche.;I oppose the commercialization of all areas of life.
Die Aktivistin mobilisiert zivilgesellschaftlichen Widerstand gegen autoritäre Tendenzen.;The activist mobilizes civil society resistance against authoritarian tendencies.
Obwohl ich angefeindet werde, bleibe ich meinen Prinzipien treu.;Although I am attacked, I remain true to my principles.
Der Demographiewissenschaftler prognostiziert gesellschaftliche Veränderungen aufgrund alternder Bevölkerungen.;The demographer predicts social changes due to aging populations.
Mein Neffe sensibilisiert Menschen für strukturelle Diskriminierung im Bildungssystem.;My nephew sensitizes people to structural discrimination in the education system.
Wenn Privilegien unsichtbar bleiben, perpetuieren sich soziale Ungerechtigkeiten.;When privileges remain invisible, social injustices perpetuate themselves.
Der Ethiker hinterfragt moralische Implikationen technologischer Innovationen kritisch.;The ethicist critically questions moral implications of technological innovations.
Nachdem ich mich emanzipiert hatte, gestaltete ich mein Leben selbstbestimmt.;After I had emancipated myself, I shaped my life self-determinedly.
Ich dekonstruiere hegemoniale Narrative und suche alternative Perspektiven.;I deconstruct hegemonic narratives and seek alternative perspectives.
Die Urbanistin gestaltet inklusive Stadträume für diverse Bevölkerungsgruppen.;The urbanist designs inclusive urban spaces for diverse population groups.
Obwohl ich Rückschläge erleide, behalte ich meine Vision bei.;Although I suffer setbacks, I maintain my vision.
Der Konfliktforscher analysiert Eskalationsmechanismen in internationalen Konflikten.;The conflict researcher analyzes escalation mechanisms in international conflicts.
Meine Tante thematisiert Tabuthemen und provoziert notwendige gesellschaftliche Debatten.;My aunt addresses taboo topics and provokes necessary social debates.
Wenn Dissens unterdrückt wird, verarmt der öffentliche Diskurs intellektuell.;When dissent is suppressed, public discourse becomes intellectually impoverished.
Der Genderforscherin gelingt es, Stereotypen wissenschaftlich zu widerlegen.;The gender researcher succeeds in scientifically refuting stereotypes.
Nachdem ich privilegiert aufwuchs, erkannte ich später strukturelle Benachteiligungen.;After I grew up privileged, I later recognized structural disadvantages.
Ich solidarisiere mich mit marginalisierten Gruppen in unserer Gesellschaft.;I show solidarity with marginalized groups in our society.
Die Ökonomin entlarvt neoliberale Mythen durch empirische Forschung.;The economist exposes neoliberal myths through empirical research.
Obwohl ich Widerstand erfahre, artikuliere ich unbequeme Wahrheiten.;Although I experience resistance, I articulate uncomfortable truths.
Der Sozialpsychologe erforscht Mechanismen von Gruppendynamik und Konformitätsdruck.;The social psychologist researches mechanisms of group dynamics and conformity pressure.
Mein Bruder entlarvt Greenwashing-Strategien multinationaler Konzerne öffentlich.;My brother publicly exposes greenwashing strategies of multinational corporations.
Wenn Komplexität reduziert wird, entstehen gefährliche Vereinfachungen.;When complexity is reduced, dangerous simplifications arise.
Der Menschenrechtsaktivist prangert systematische Folter in Gefängnissen an.;The human rights activist denounces systematic torture in prisons.
Nachdem ich sensibilisiert wurde, reflektiere ich meine eigenen Privilegien.;After I was sensitized, I reflect on my own privileges.
Ich hinterfrage koloniale Kontinuitäten in gegenwärtigen Machtstrukturen.;I question colonial continuities in present power structures.
Die Linguistin dekonstruiert diskriminierende Sprachmuster in Medien systematisch.;The linguist systematically deconstructs discriminatory language patterns in media.
Obwohl ich Anfeindungen erlebe, setze ich mich weiter ein.;Although I experience hostilities, I continue to commit myself.
Der Politologe analysiert populistische Rhetoriken und ihre manipulativen Mechanismen.;The political scientist analyzes populist rhetoric and its manipulative mechanisms.
Meine Schwester initiiert Graswurzelbewegungen für lokale Selbstbestimmung.;My sister initiates grassroots movements for local self-determination.
Wenn Alternativen fehlen, zementieren sich bestehende Machtverhältnisse.;When alternatives are lacking, existing power relations become cemented.
Der Umweltaktivist sabotiert symbolisch umweltschädliche Infrastrukturprojekte.;The environmental activist symbolically sabotages environmentally harmful infrastructure projects.
Nachdem ich radikalisiert wurde, engagiere ich mich kompromisslos.;After I was radicalized, I commit myself uncompromisingly.
Ich praktiziere zivilen Ungehorsam gegen ungerechte Gesetze.;I practice civil disobedience against unjust laws.
Die Soziologin untersucht Prekarisierung von Arbeitsverhältnissen in neoliberalen Ökonomien.;The sociologist examines precarization of employment relationships in neoliberal economies.
Obwohl ich kriminalisiert werde, verteidige ich fundamentale Rechte.;Although I am criminalized, I defend fundamental rights.
Der Philosoph dekonstruiert anthropozentrische Weltbilder zugunsten ökologischer Ethik.;The philosopher deconstructs anthropocentric worldviews in favor of ecological ethics.
Mein Cousin organisiert Direktaktionen gegen Konzerne mit ausbeuterischen Praktiken.;My cousin organizes direct actions against corporations with exploitative practices.
Wenn Repression zunimmt, radikalisieren sich Widerstandsbewegungen.;When repression increases, resistance movements become radicalized.
Der Aktivist infiltriert Netzwerke, um Korruption aufzudecken.;The activist infiltrates networks to expose corruption.
Nachdem ich desillusioniert wurde, kämpfe ich nun außerparlamentarisch.;After I became disillusioned, I now fight extraparliamentarily.
Ich subvertiere hegemoniale Diskurse durch künstlerische Interventionen.;I subvert hegemonic discourses through artistic interventions.
Die Aktivistin besetzt symbolisch privatisierte öffentliche Räume.;The activist symbolically occupies privatized public spaces.
Obwohl ich diffamiert werde, demaskiere ich Heuchelei öffentlich.;Although I am defamed, I unmask hypocrisy publicly.
Der Ökonom entlarvt systematische Steuervermeidung durch transnationale Eliten.;The economist exposes systematic tax avoidance by transnational elites.
Meine Nichte organisiert autonome Kollektive für alternative Lebensformen.;My niece organizes autonomous collectives for alternative lifestyles.
Wenn Utopien fehlen, stagniert gesellschaftlicher Fortschritt.;When utopias are lacking, social progress stagnates.
Der Revolutionär mobilisiert Basis gegen oligarchische Machtstrukturen.;The revolutionary mobilizes the grassroots against oligarchic power structures.
Nachdem ich erwacht bin, sehe ich Unterdrückungsmechanismen überall.;After I have awakened, I see mechanisms of oppression everywhere.
Ich sabotiere konsumistische Strukturen durch radikalen Minimalismus.;I sabotage consumerist structures through radical minimalism.
Die Theoretikerin formuliert emanzipatorische Visionen für postkapitalistische Gesellschaften.;The theorist formulates emancipatory visions for postcapitalist societies.
Obwohl ich verfolgt werde, agitiere ich weiterhin unermüdlich.;Although I am persecuted, I continue to agitate tirelessly.
Der Anarchist dekonstruiert Staatlichkeit als Herrschaftsinstrument fundamental.;The anarchist fundamentally deconstructs statehood as an instrument of domination.
Mein Bruder praktiziert Konsumverweigerung als politischen Akt konsequent.;My brother consistently practices consumption refusal as a political act.
Wenn Widerstand kriminalisiert wird, legitimiert sich ziviler Ungehorsam.;When resistance is criminalized, civil disobedience legitimizes itself.
Der Subversive unterminiert kapitalistische Logiken durch alternative Ökonomien.;The subversive undermines capitalist logics through alternative economies.